Ohio, session 136, SB370.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That sections 2903.10, 2903.11, 2903.12, 2903.13, 2903.14, 2903.16, 2903.18, 2903.21, 2903.211, 2903.22, 2903.31, 2905.01, 2905.11, 2905.12, 2905.22, 2905.32, 2907.03, 2907.05, 2909.01, 2909.06, 2909.07, 2911.02, 2911.12, 2913.01, 2913.02, 2913.03, 2913.04, 2913.05, 2913.21, 2913.31, 2913.43, 2913.49, 2913.61, 2917.21, and 2919.25 of the Revised Code be amended to read as follows: Sec. 2903.10. As used in sections 2903.13 and2903.11 to 2903.14 and sections 2903.16 to 2903.31 of the Revised Code: (A) "Person with a functional impairment" means any person who has a physical or mental impairment that prevents the person from providing for the person's own care or protection or whose infirmities caused by aging prevent the person from providing for the person's own care or protection. (B) "Caretaker" means a person who assumes the duty to provide for the care and protection of a person with a functional impairmentdisability on a voluntary basis, by contract, through receipt of payment for care and protection, as a result of a family relationship, or by order of a court of competent jurisdiction. "Caretaker" does not include a person who owns, operates, or administers, or who is an agent or employee of, a care facility, as defined in section 2903.33 of the Revised Code. (B) "Disability" has the same meaning as in section 4112.01 of the Revised Code. Sec. 2903.11. (A) No person shall knowingly do either of the following: (1) Cause serious physical harm to another or to another's unborn; (2) Cause or attempt to cause physical harm to another or to another's unborn by means of a deadly weapon or dangerous ordnance. (B) No person, with knowledge that the person has tested positive as a carrier of a virus that causes acquired immunodeficiency syndrome, shall knowingly do any of the following: (1) Engage in sexual conduct with another person without disclosing that knowledge to the other person prior to engaging in the sexual conduct; (2) Engage in sexual conduct with a person whom the offender knows or has reasonable cause to believe lacks the mental capacity to appreciate the significance of the knowledge that the offender has tested positive as a carrier of a virus that causes acquired immunodeficiency syndrome; (3) Engage in sexual conduct with a person under eighteen years of age who is not the spouse of the offender. (C) The prosecution of a person under this section does not preclude prosecution of that person under section 2907.02 of the Revised Code. (D)(1)(a) Whoever violates this section is guilty of felonious assault. Except as otherwise provided in this division or division (D)(1)(b) of this section, felonious assault is a felony of the second degree. If the victim of a violation of division (A) of this section is a peace officer or , an investigator of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation, or a person with a disability and the offender knows or reasonably should know that the victim is a person with a disability, felonious assault is a felony of the first degree. (b) Regardless of whether the felonious assault is a felony of the first or second degree under division (D)(1)(a) of this section, if the offender also is convicted of or pleads guilty to a specification as described in section 2941.1423 of the Revised Code that was included in the indictment, count in the indictment, or information charging the offense, except as otherwise provided in this division or unless a longer prison term is required under any other provision of law, the court shall sentence the offender to a mandatory prison term as provided in division (B)(8) of section 2929.14 of the Revised Code. If the victim of the offense is a peace officer or, an investigator of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation, or a person with a disability and the offender knows or reasonably should know that the victim is a person with a disability, and if the victim suffered serious physical harm as a result of the commission of the offense, felonious assault is a felony of the first degree, and the court, pursuant to division (F) of section 2929.13 of the Revised Code, shall impose as a mandatory prison term one of the definite prison terms prescribed for a felony of the first degree in division (A)(1)(b) of section 2929.14 of the Revised Code, except that if the violation is committed on or after the effective date of this amendment March 22, 2019, the court shall impose as the minimum prison term for the offense a mandatory prison term that is one of the minimum terms prescribed for a felony of the first degree in division (A)(1)(a) of section 2929.14 of the Revised Code. (2) In addition to any other sanctions imposed pursuant to division (D)(1) of this section for felonious assault committed in violation of division (A)(1) or (2) of this section, if the offender also is convicted of or pleads guilty to a specification of the type described in section 2941.1425 of the Revised Code that was included in the indictment, count in the indictment, or information charging the offense, the court shall sentence the offender to a mandatory prison term under division (B)(9) of section 2929.14 of the Revised Code. (3) If the victim of a felonious assault committed in violation of division (A) of this section is a child under ten years of age and if the offender also is convicted of or pleads guilty to a specification of the type described in section 2941.1426 of the Revised Code that was included in the indictment, count in the indictment, or information charging the offense, in addition to any other sanctions imposed pursuant to division (D)(1) of this section, the court shall sentence the offender to a mandatory prison term pursuant to division (B)(10) of section 2929.14 of the Revised Code. (4) In addition to any other sanctions imposed pursuant to division (D)(1) of this section for felonious assault committed in violation of division (A)(2) of this section, if the deadly weapon used in the commission of the violation is a motor vehicle, the court shall impose upon the offender a class two suspension of the offender's driver's license, commercial driver's license, temporary instruction permit, probationary license, or nonresident operating privilege as specified in division (A)(2) of section 4510.02 of the Revised Code. (E) As used in this section: (1) "Deadly weapon" and "dangerous ordnance" have the same meanings as in section 2923.11 of the Revised Code. (2) "Motor vehicle" has the same meaning as in section 4501.01 of the Revised Code. (3) "Peace officer" has the same meaning as in section 2935.01 of the Revised Code. (4) "Sexual conduct" has the same meaning as in section 2907.01 of the Revised Code, except that, as used in this section, it does not include the insertion of an instrument, apparatus, or other object that is not a part of the body into the vaginal or anal opening of another, unless the offender knew at the time of the insertion that the instrument, apparatus, or other object carried the offender's bodily fluid. (5) "Investigator of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation" means an investigator of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation who is commissioned by the superintendent of the bureau as a special agent for the purpose of assisting law enforcement officers or providing emergency assistance to peace officers pursuant to authority granted under section 109.541 of the Revised Code. (6) "Investigator" has the same meaning as in section 109.541 of the Revised Code. (F) The provisions of division (D)(2) of this section and of division (F)(20) of section 2929.13, divisions (B)(9) and (C)(6) of section 2929.14, and section 2941.1425 of the Revised Code shall be known as "Judy's Law." Sec. 2903.12. (A) No person, while under the influence of sudden passion or in a sudden fit of rage, either of which is brought on by serious provocation occasioned by the victim that is reasonably sufficient to incite the person into using deadly force, shall knowingly: (1) Cause serious physical harm to another or to another's unborn; (2) Cause or attempt to cause physical harm to another or to another's unborn by means of a deadly weapon or dangerous ordnance, as defined in section 2923.11 of the Revised Code. (B) Whoever violates this section is guilty of aggravated assault. Except as otherwise provided in this division, aggravated assault is a felony of the fourth degree. If the victim of the offense is a peace officer or , an investigator of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation, or a person with a disability and the offender knows or reasonably should know that the victim is a person with a disability, aggravated assault is a felony of the third degree. Regardless of whether the offense is a felony of the third or fourth degree under this division, if the offender also is convicted of or pleads guilty to a specification as described in section 2941.1423 of the Revised Code that was included in the indictment, count in the indictment, or information charging the offense, except as otherwise provided in this division, the court shall sentence the offender to a mandatory prison term as provided in division (B)(8) of section 2929.14 of the Revised Code. If the victim of the offense is a peace officer or, an investigator of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation, or a person with a disability and the offender knows or reasonably should know that the victim is a person with a disability, and if the victim suffered serious physical harm as a result of the commission of the offense, aggravated assault is a felony of the third degree, and the court, pursuant to division (F) of section 2929.13 of the Revised Code, shall impose as a mandatory prison term one of the definite prison terms prescribed in division (A)(3)(b) of section 2929.14 of the Revised Code for a felony of the third degree. (C) As used in this section: (1) "Investigator of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation" has the same meaning as in section 2903.11 of the Revised Code. (2) "Peace officer" has the same meaning as in section 2935.01 of the Revised Code. Sec. 2903.13. (A) No person shall knowingly cause or attempt to cause physical harm to another or to another's unborn. (B) No person shall recklessly cause serious physical harm to another or to another's unborn. (C)(1) Whoever violates this section is guilty of assault, and the court shall sentence the offender as provided in this division and divisions (C)(1), (2), (3), (4), (5), (6), (7), (8), (9), and (10) of this section. Except as otherwise provided in division (C)(2), (3), (4), (5), (6), (7), (8), or (9) of this section, assault is a misdemeanor of the first degree. (2) Except as otherwise provided in this division, if the offense is committed by a caretaker against a person with a functional impairment under the caretaker's carevictim is a person with a disability and the offender knows or reasonably should know that the victim is a person with a disability, assault is a felony of the fourth degree. If the offense is committed by a caretaker against a person with a functional impairment under the caretaker's carevictim is a person with a disability and the offender knows or reasonably should know that the victim is a person with a disability, if the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a violation of this section or section 2903.11 or 2903.16 of the Revised Code, and if in relation to the previous conviction the offender was a caretaker and the victim was a person with a functional impairment under the offender's carevictim was a person with a disability and the offender knew or reasonably should have known that the victim was a person with a disability, assault is a felony of the third degree. (3) If the offense occurs in or on the grounds of a state correctional institution or an institution of the department of youth services, the victim of the offense is an employee of the department of rehabilitation and correction or the department of youth services, and the offense is committed by a person incarcerated in the state correctional institution or by a person institutionalized in the department of youth services institution pursuant to a commitment to the department of youth services, assault is a felony of the third degree. (4) If the offense is committed in any of the following circumstances, assault is a felony of the fifth degree: (a) The offense occurs in or on the grounds of a local correctional facility, the victim of the offense is an employee of the local correctional facility or a probation department or is on the premises of the facility for business purposes or as a visitor, and the offense is committed by a person who is under custody in the facility subsequent to the person's arrest for any crime or delinquent act, subsequent to the person's being charged with or convicted of any crime, or subsequent to the person's being alleged to be or adjudicated a delinquent child. (b) The offense occurs off the grounds of a state correctional institution and off the grounds of an institution of the department of youth services, the victim of the offense is an employee of the department of rehabilitation and correction, the department of youth services, or a probation department, the offense occurs during the employee's official work hours and while the employee is engaged in official work responsibilities, and the offense is committed by a person incarcerated in a state correctional institution or institutionalized in the department of youth services who temporarily is outside of the institution for any purpose, by a parolee, by an offender under transitional control, under a community control sanction, or on an escorted visit, by a person under post-release control, or by an offender under any other type of supervision by a government agency. (c) The offense occurs off the grounds of a local correctional facility, the victim of the offense is an employee of the local correctional facility or a probation department, the offense occurs during the employee's official work hours and while the employee is engaged in official work responsibilities, and the offense is committed by a person who is under custody in the facility subsequent to the person's arrest for any crime or delinquent act, subsequent to the person being charged with or convicted of any crime, or subsequent to the person being alleged to be or adjudicated a delinquent child and who temporarily is outside of the facility for any purpose or by a parolee, by an offender under transitional control, under a community control sanction, or on an escorted visit, by a person under post-release control, or by an offender under any other type of supervision by a government agency. (d) The victim of the offense is a school teacher or administrator or a school bus operator, and the offense occurs in a school, on school premises, in a school building, on a school bus, or while the victim is outside of school premises or a school bus and is engaged in duties or official responsibilities associated with the victim's employment or position as a school teacher or administrator or a school bus operator, including, but not limited to, driving, accompanying, or chaperoning students at or on class or field trips, athletic events, or other school extracurricular activities or functions outside of school premises. (5) If the assault is committed in any of the following circumstances, assault is a felony of the fourth degree: (a) The victim of the offense is a peace officer or an investigator of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation, a firefighter, or a person performing emergency medical service, while in the performance of the officer's, investigator's, firefighter's, or person's official duties. (b) The victim of the offense is an emergency service responder, the offender knows or reasonably should know that the victim is an emergency service responder, and it is the offender's specific purpose to commit the offense against an emergency service responder. (c) The victim of the offense is a family or household member or co-worker of a person who is an emergency service responder, the offender knows or reasonably should know that the victim is a family or household member or co-worker of an emergency service responder, and it is the offender's specific purpose to commit the offense against a family or household member or co-worker of an emergency service responder. (6) If the offense is a felony of the fourth degree under division (C)(5)(a) of this section, if the victim of the offense is a peace officer or an investigator of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation, and if the victim suffered serious physical harm as a result of the commission of the offense, the court, pursuant to division (F) of section 2929.13 of the Revised Code, shall impose as a mandatory prison term one of the prison terms prescribed for a felony of the fourth degree that is at least twelve months in duration. (7) If the victim of the offense is an officer or employee of a public children services agency or a private child placing agency and the offense relates to the officer's or employee's performance or anticipated performance of official responsibilities or duties, assault is either a felony of the fifth degree or, if the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to an offense of violence, the victim of that prior offense was an officer or employee of a public children services agency or private child placing agency, and that prior offense related to the officer's or employee's performance or anticipated performance of official responsibilities or duties, a felony of the fourth degree. (8) If the victim of the offense is a health care professional of a hospital, a health care worker of a hospital, or a security officer of a hospital whom the offender knows or has reasonable cause to know is a health care professional of a hospital, a health care worker of a hospital, or a security officer of a hospital, if the victim is engaged in the performance of the victim's duties, and if the hospital offers de-escalation or crisis intervention training for such professionals, workers, or officers, assault is one of the following: (a) Except as otherwise provided in division (C)(8)(b) of this section, assault committed in the specified circumstances is a misdemeanor of the first degree. Notwithstanding the fine specified in division (A)(2)(a) of section 2929.28 of the Revised Code for a misdemeanor of the first degree, in sentencing the offender under this division and if the court decides to impose a fine, the court may impose upon the offender a fine of not more than five thousand dollars. (b) If the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to one or more assault or homicide offenses committed against hospital personnel, assault committed in the specified circumstances is a felony of the fifth degree. (9) If the victim of the offense is a judge, magistrate, prosecutor, or court official or employee whom the offender knows or has reasonable cause to know is a judge, magistrate, prosecutor, or court official or employee, and if the victim is engaged in the performance of the victim's duties, assault is one of the following: (a) Except as otherwise provided in division (C)(9)(b) of this section, assault committed in the specified circumstances is a misdemeanor of the first degree. In sentencing the offender under this division, if the court decides to impose a fine, notwithstanding the fine specified in division (A)(2)(a) of section 2929.28 of the Revised Code for a misdemeanor of the first degree, the court may impose upon the offender a fine of not more than five thousand dollars. (b) If the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to one or more assault or homicide offenses committed against justice system personnel, assault committed in the specified circumstances is a felony of the fifth degree. (10) If an offender who is convicted of or pleads guilty to assault when it is a misdemeanor also is convicted of or pleads guilty to a specification as described in section 2941.1423 of the Revised Code that was included in the indictment, count in the indictment, or information charging the offense, the court shall sentence the offender to a mandatory jail term as provided in division (F) of section 2929.24 of the Revised Code. If an offender who is convicted of or pleads guilty to assault when it is a felony also is convicted of or pleads guilty to a specification as described in section 2941.1423 of the Revised Code that was included in the indictment, count in the indictment, or information charging the offense, except as otherwise provided in division (C)(6) of this section, the court shall sentence the offender to a mandatory prison term as provided in division (B)(8) of section 2929.14 of the Revised Code. (D) A prosecution for a violation of this section does not preclude a prosecution of a violation of any other section of the Revised Code. One or more acts, a series of acts, or a course of behavior that can be prosecuted under this section or any other section of the Revised Code may be prosecuted under this section, the other section of the Revised Code, or both sections. However, if an offender is convicted of or pleads guilty to a violation of this section and also is convicted of or pleads guilty to a violation of section 2903.22 of the Revised Code based on the same conduct involving the same victim that was the basis of the violation of this section, the two offenses are allied offenses of similar import under section 2941.25 of the Revised Code. (E) As used in this section: (1) "Peace officer" has the same meaning as in section 2935.01 of the Revised Code. (2) "Firefighter" means any person who is a firefighter as defined in section 3937.41 of the Revised Code and, for purposes of division (E)(21) of this section, also includes a member of a fire department as defined in section 742.01 of the Revised Code. (3) "Emergency medical service" has the same meaning as in section 4765.01 of the Revised Code. (4) "Local correctional facility" means a county, multicounty, municipal, municipal-county, or multicounty-municipal jail or workhouse, a minimum security jail established under section 341.23 or 753.21 of the Revised Code, or another county, multicounty, municipal, municipal-county, or multicounty-municipal facility used for the custody of persons arrested for any crime or delinquent act, persons charged with or convicted of any crime, or persons alleged to be or adjudicated a delinquent child. (5) "Employee of a local correctional facility" means a person who is an employee of the political subdivision or of one or more of the affiliated political subdivisions that operates the local correctional facility and who operates or assists in the operation of the facility. (6) "School teacher or administrator" means either of the following: (a) A person who is employed in the public schools of the state under a contract described in section 3311.77 or 3319.08 of the Revised Code in a position in which the person is required to have a certificate issued pursuant to sections 3319.22 to 3319.311 of the Revised Code. (b) A person who is employed by a nonpublic school for which the director of education and workforce prescribes minimum standards under section 3301.07 of the Revised Code and who is certificated in accordance with section 3301.071 of the Revised Code. (7) "Community control sanction" has the same meaning as in section 2929.01 of the Revised Code. (8) "Escorted visit" means an escorted visit granted under section 2967.27 of the Revised Code. (9) "Post-release control" and "transitional control" have the same meanings as in section 2967.01 of the Revised Code. (10) "Investigator of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation" has the same meaning as in section 2903.11 of the Revised Code. (11) "Health care professional" and "health care worker" have the same meanings as in section 2305.234 of the Revised Code. (12) "Assault or homicide offense committed against hospital personnel" means a violation of this section or of section 2903.01, 2903.02, 2903.03, 2903.04, 2903.041, 2903.11, 2903.12, or 2903.14 of the Revised Code committed in circumstances in which all of the following apply: (a) The victim of the offense was a health care professional of a hospital, a health care worker of a hospital, or a security officer of a hospital. (b) The offender knew or had reasonable cause to know that the victim was a health care professional of a hospital, a health care worker of a hospital, or a security officer of a hospital. (c) The victim was engaged in the performance of the victim's duties. (d) The hospital offered de-escalation or crisis intervention training for such professionals, workers, or officers. (13) "De-escalation or crisis intervention training" means de-escalation or crisis intervention training for health care professionals of a hospital, health care workers of a hospital, and security officers of a hospital to facilitate interaction with patients, members of a patient's family, and visitors, including those with mental impairments. (14) "Assault or homicide offense committed against justice system personnel" means a violation of this section or of section 2903.01, 2903.02, 2903.03, 2903.04, 2903.041, 2903.11, 2903.12, or 2903.14 of the Revised Code committed in circumstances in which the victim of the offense was a judge, magistrate, prosecutor, or court official or employee whom the offender knew or had reasonable cause to know was a judge, magistrate, prosecutor, or court official or employee, and the victim was engaged in the performance of the victim's duties. (15) "Court official or employee" means any official or employee of a court created under the constitution or statutes of this state or of a United States court located in this state. (16) "Judge" means a judge of a court created under the constitution or statutes of this state or of a United States court located in this state. (17) "Magistrate" means an individual who is appointed by a court of record of this state and who has the powers and may perform the functions specified in Civil Rule 53, Criminal Rule 19, or Juvenile Rule 40, or an individual who is appointed by a United States court located in this state who has similar powers and functions. (18) "Prosecutor" has the same meaning as in section 2935.01 of the Revised Code. (19)(a) "Hospital" means, subject to division (E)(19)(b) of this section, an institution classified as a hospital under section 3701.01 of the Revised Code in which are provided to patients diagnostic, medical, surgical, obstetrical, psychiatric, or rehabilitation care or a hospital operated by a health maintenance organization. (b) "Hospital" does not include any of the following: (i) A facility licensed under Chapter 3721. of the Revised Code, a health care facility operated by the department of mental health and addiction services or the department of developmental disabilities, a health maintenance organization that does not operate a hospital, or the office of any private, licensed health care professional, whether organized for individual or group practice; (ii) An institution for the sick that is operated exclusively for patients who use spiritual means for healing and for whom the acceptance of medical care is inconsistent with their religious beliefs, accredited by a national accrediting organization, exempt from federal income taxation under section 501 of the "Internal Revenue Code of 1986," 100 Stat. 2085, 26 U.S.C. 1, as amended, and providing twenty-four-hour nursing care pursuant to the exemption in division (E) of section 4723.32 of the Revised Code from the licensing requirements of Chapter 4723. of the Revised Code. (20) "Health maintenance organization" has the same meaning as in section 3727.01 of the Revised Code. (21) "Emergency service responder" means any law enforcement officer, first responder, emergency medical technician-basic, emergency medical technician-intermediate, emergency medical technician-paramedic, firefighter, or volunteer firefighter. (22) "Family or household member" means any of the following: (a) Any of the following who is residing or has resided with a person who is employed as an emergency service responder: (i) A spouse, a person living as a spouse, or a former spouse of a person who is employed as an emergency service responder; (ii) A parent, a foster parent, or a child of a person who is employed as an emergency service responder, or another person related by consanguinity or affinity to a person who is employed as an emergency service responder; (iii) A parent or a child of a spouse, person living as a spouse, or former spouse of a person who is employed as an emergency service responder, or another person related by consanguinity or affinity to a spouse, person living as a spouse, or former spouse of a person who is employed as an emergency service responder. (b) The natural parent of any child of whom a person who is employed as an emergency service responder is the other natural parent or is the putative other natural parent. (23) "First responder," "emergency medical technician-basic," "emergency medical technician-intermediate," and "emergency medical technician-paramedic" have the same meanings as in section 4765.01 of the Revised Code. (24) "Volunteer firefighter" has the same meaning as in section 146.01 of the Revised Code. (25) "Person living as a spouse" means a person who is living or has lived with a person who is employed as an emergency service responder in a common law marital relationship, who otherwise is cohabiting with a person who is employed as an emergency service responder, or who otherwise has cohabited with a person who is employed as an emergency service responder within five years prior to the date of the alleged commission of the act in question. (26) "Co-worker" means a person who is employed by the organization or entity that is served by a person who is employed as an emergency service responder. Sec. 2903.14. (A) No person shall negligently, by means of a deadly weapon or dangerous ordnance as defined in section 2923.11 of the Revised Code, cause physical harm to another or to another's unborn. (B) Whoever violates this section is guilty of negligent assault,. Except as otherwise provided in this division, negligent assault is a misdemeanor of the third degree. If the victim is a person with a disability and the offender knows or reasonably should know that the victim is a person with a disability, negligent assault is a misdemeanor of the second degree. Sec. 2903.16. (A) No caretaker shall knowingly fail to provide a person with a functional impairment disability, who the caretaker knows or reasonably should know is a person with a disability, under the caretaker's care with any treatment, care, goods, or service that is necessary to maintain the health or safety of the person with a functional impairment disability when this failure results in physical harm or serious physical harm to the person with a functional impairmentdisability. (B) No caretaker shall recklessly fail to provide a person with a functional impairment disability, who the caretaker knows or reasonably should know is a person with a disability, under the caretaker's care with any treatment, care, goods, or service that is necessary to maintain the health or safety of the person with a functional impairment disability when this failure results in serious physical harm to the person with a functional impairmentdisability. (C)(1) Whoever violates division (A) of this section is guilty of knowingly failing to provide for a person with a functional impairmentdisability, a misdemeanor of the first degree. If the person with a functional impairment disability under the offender's care suffers serious physical harm as a result of the violation of this section, a violation of division (A) of this section is a felony of the fourth degree. (2) Whoever violates division (B) of this section is guilty of recklessly failing to provide for a person with a functional impairmentdisability, a misdemeanor of the second degree. If the person with a functional impairment disability under the offender's care suffers serious physical harm as a result of the violation of this section, a violation of division (B) of this section is a felony of the fourth degree. Sec. 2903.18. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Strangulation or suffocation" means any act that impedes the normal breathing or circulation of the blood by applying pressure to the throat or neck, or by covering the nose and mouth. (2) "Dating relationship" has the same meaning as in section 3113.31 of the Revised Code. (3) "Family or household member" has the same meaning as in section 2919.25 of the Revised Code. (4) "Person with whom the offender is or was in a dating relationship" means a person who at the time of the conduct in question is in a dating relationship with the defendant or who, within the twelve months preceding the conduct in question, has had a dating relationship with the defendant. (B) No person shall knowingly do any of the following: (1) Cause serious physical harm to another by means of strangulation or suffocation; (2) Create a substantial risk of serious physical harm to another by means of strangulation or suffocation; (3) Cause or create a substantial risk of physical harm to another by means of strangulation or suffocation. (C) Whoever violates this section is guilty of strangulation. (1) AExcept as otherwise provided in this division, a violation of division (B)(1) of this section is a felony of the second degree. If the victim of a violation of division (B)(1) of this section is a person with a disability, and the offender knows or reasonably should know that the victim is a person with a disability, a violation of division (B)(1) of this section is a felony of the first degree. (2) AExcept as otherwise provided in this division, a violation of division (B)(2) of this section is a felony of the third degree. If the victim of a violation of division (B)(2) of this section is a person with a disability, and the offender knows or reasonably should know that the victim is a person with a disability, a violation of division (B)(2) of this section is a felony of the second degree. (3) AExcept as otherwise provided in this division, a violation of division (B)(3) of this section is a felony of the fifth degree. If the victim of thea violation of division (B)(3) of this section is a family or household member, or is a person with whom the offender is or was in a dating relationship, or is a person with a disability and the offender knows or reasonably should know that the victim is a person with a disability, a violation of division (B)(3) of this section is a felony of the fourth degree. If the victim of the offense is a family or household member, or is a person with whom the offender is or was in a dating relationship, or is a person with a disability and the offender knows or reasonably should know that the victim is a person with a disability, and the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a felony offense of violence, or if the offender knew that the victim of the violation was pregnant at the time of the violation, a violation of division (B)(3) of this section is a felony of the third degree. (D) It is an affirmative defense to a charge under division (B) of this section that the act was done as part of a medical or other procedure undertaken to aid or benefit the victim. Sec. 2903.21. (A) No person shall knowingly cause another to believe that the offender will cause serious physical harm to the person or property of the other person, the other person's unborn, or a member of the other person's immediate family. In addition to any other basis for the other person's belief that the offender will cause serious physical harm to the person or property of the other person, the other person's unborn, or a member of the other person's immediate family, the other person's belief may be based on words or conduct of the offender that are directed at or identify a corporation, association, or other organization that employs the other person or to which the other person belongs. (B) Whoever violates this section is guilty of aggravated menacing. Except as otherwise provided in this division, aggravated menacing is a misdemeanor of the first degree. If the victim of the offense is a person with a disability, and the offender knows or reasonably should know that the victim is a person with a disability, aggravated menacing is a felony of the fifth degree. If the victim of the offense is an officer or employee of a public children services agency or a private child placing agency and the offense relates to the officer's or employee's performance or anticipated performance of official responsibilities or duties, aggravated menacing is a felony of the fifth degree or, if the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to an offense of violence, the victim of that prior offense was an officer or employee of a public children services agency or private child placing agency, and that prior offense related to the officer's or employee's performance or anticipated performance of official responsibilities or duties, a felony of the fourth degree. (C) As used in this section, "organization" includes an entity that is a governmental employer. Sec. 2903.211. (A)(1) No person by engaging in a pattern of conduct shall knowingly cause another person to believe that the offender will cause physical harm to the other person or a family or household member of the other person or cause mental distress to the other person or a family or household member of the other person. In addition to any other basis for the other person's belief that the offender will cause physical harm to the other person or the other person's family or household member or mental distress to the other person or the other person's family or household member, the other person's belief or mental distress may be based on words or conduct of the offender that are directed at or identify a corporation, association, or other organization that employs the other person or to which the other person belongs. (2) No person, through the use of any form of written communication or any electronic method of remotely transferring information, including, but not limited to, any computer, computer network, computer program, computer system, or telecommunication device shall post a message or use any intentionally written or verbal graphic gesture with purpose to do either of the following: (a) Violate division (A)(1) of this section; (b) Urge or incite another to commit a violation of division (A)(1) of this section. (3) No person, with a sexual motivation, shall violate division (A)(1) or (2) of this section. (B) Whoever violates this section is guilty of menacing by stalking. (1) Except as otherwise provided in divisions (B)(2) and, (3), and (4) of this section, menacing by stalking is a misdemeanor of the first degree. (2) Menacing by stalking is a felony of the fourth degree if any of the following applies: (a) The offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a violation of this section or a violation of section 2911.211 of the Revised Code. (b) In committing the offense under division (A)(1), (2), or (3) of this section, the offender made a threat of physical harm to or against the victim, or as a result of an offense committed under division (A)(2) or (3) of this section, a third person induced by the offender's posted message made a threat of physical harm to or against the victim. (c) In committing the offense under division (A)(1), (2), or (3) of this section, the offender trespassed on the land or premises where the victim lives, is employed, or attends school, or as a result of an offense committed under division (A)(2) or (3) of this section, a third person induced by the offender's posted message trespassed on the land or premises where the victim lives, is employed, or attends school. (d) The victim of the offense is a minor. (e) The offender has a history of violence toward the victim or any other person or a history of other violent acts toward the victim or any other person. (f) While committing the offense under division (A)(1) of this section or a violation of division (A)(3) of this section based on conduct in violation of division (A)(1) of this section, the offender had a deadly weapon on or about the offender's person or under the offender's control. Division (B)(2)(f) of this section does not apply in determining the penalty for a violation of division (A)(2) of this section or a violation of division (A)(3) of this section based on conduct in violation of division (A)(2) of this section. (g) At the time of the commission of the offense, the offender was the subject of a protection order issued under section 2903.213 or 2903.214 of the Revised Code, regardless of whether the person to be protected under the order is the victim of the offense or another person. (h) In committing the offense under division (A)(1), (2), or (3) of this section, the offender caused serious physical harm to the premises at which the victim resides, to the real property on which that premises is located, or to any personal property located on that premises, or, as a result of an offense committed under division (A)(2) of this section or an offense committed under division (A)(3) of this section based on a violation of division (A)(2) of this section, a third person induced by the offender's posted message caused serious physical harm to that premises, that real property, or any personal property on that premises. (i) Prior to committing the offense, the offender had been determined to represent a substantial risk of physical harm to others as manifested by evidence of then-recent homicidal or other violent behavior, evidence of then-recent threats that placed another in reasonable fear of violent behavior and serious physical harm, or other evidence of then-present dangerousness. (3) If the victim of the offense is an officer or employee of a public children services agency or a private child placing agency and the offense relates to the officer's or employee's performance or anticipated performance of official responsibilities or duties, menacing by stalking is either a felony of the fifth degree or, if the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to an offense of violence, the victim of that prior offense was an officer or employee of a public children services agency or private child placing agency, and that prior offense related to the officer's or employee's performance or anticipated performance of official responsibilities or duties, a felony of the fourth degree. (4) If the victim of the offense is a person with a disability and the offender knows or reasonably should know that the victim is a person with a disability, menacing by stalking is a felony of the fifth degree. (C) Section 2919.271 of the Revised Code applies in relation to a defendant charged with a violation of this section. (D) As used in this section: (1) "Pattern of conduct" means two or more actions or incidents closely related in time, whether or not there has been a prior conviction based on any of those actions or incidents, or two or more actions or incidents closely related in time, whether or not there has been a prior conviction based on any of those actions or incidents, directed at one or more persons employed by or belonging to the same corporation, association, or other organization. Actions or incidents that prevent, obstruct, or delay the performance by a public official, firefighter, rescuer, emergency medical services person, or emergency facility person of any authorized act within the public official's, firefighter's, rescuer's, emergency medical services person's, or emergency facility person's official capacity, or the posting of messages, use of intentionally written or verbal graphic gestures, or receipt of information or data through the use of any form of written communication or an electronic method of remotely transferring information, including, but not limited to, a computer, computer network, computer program, computer system, or telecommunications device, may constitute a "pattern of conduct." (2) "Mental distress" means any of the following: (a) Any mental illness or condition that involves some temporary substantial incapacity; (b) Any mental illness or condition that would normally require psychiatric treatment, psychological treatment, or other mental health services, whether or not any person requested or received psychiatric treatment, psychological treatment, or other mental health services. (3) "Emergency medical services person" is the singular of "emergency medical services personnel" as defined in section 2133.21 of the Revised Code. (4) "Emergency facility person" is the singular of "emergency facility personnel" as defined in section 2909.04 of the Revised Code. (5) "Public official" has the same meaning as in section 2921.01 of the Revised Code. (6) "Computer," "computer network," "computer program," "computer system," and "telecommunications device" have the same meanings as in section 2913.01 of the Revised Code. (7) "Post a message" means transferring, sending, posting, publishing, disseminating, or otherwise communicating, or attempting to transfer, send, post, publish, disseminate, or otherwise communicate, any message or information, whether truthful or untruthful, about an individual, and whether done under one's own name, under the name of another, or while impersonating another. (8) "Third person" means, in relation to conduct as described in division (A)(2) of this section, an individual who is neither the offender nor the victim of the conduct. (9) "Sexual motivation" has the same meaning as in section 2971.01 of the Revised Code. (10) "Organization" includes an entity that is a governmental employer. (11) "Family or household member" means any of the following: (a) Any of the following who is residing or has resided with the person against whom the act prohibited in division (A)(1) of this section is committed: (i) A spouse, a person living as a spouse, or a former spouse of the person; (ii) A parent, a foster parent, or a child of the person, or another person related by consanguinity or affinity to the person; (iii) A parent or a child of a spouse, person living as a spouse, or former spouse of the person, or another person related by consanguinity or affinity to a spouse, person living as a spouse, or former spouse of the person. (b) The natural parent of any child of whom the person against whom the act prohibited in division (A)(1) of this section is committed is the other natural parent or is the putative other natural parent. (12) "Person living as a spouse" means a person who is living or has lived with the person against whom the act prohibited in division (A)(1) of this section is committed in a common law marital relationship, who otherwise is cohabiting with that person, or who otherwise has cohabited with the person within five years prior to the date of the alleged commission of the act in question. (E) The state does not need to prove in a prosecution under this section that a person requested or received psychiatric treatment, psychological treatment, or other mental health services in order to show that the person was caused mental distress as described in division (D)(2)(b) of this section. (F)(1) This section does not apply to a person solely because the person provided access or connection to or from an electronic method of remotely transferring information not under that person's control, including having provided capabilities that are incidental to providing access or connection to or from the electronic method of remotely transferring the information, and that do not include the creation of the content of the material that is the subject of the access or connection. In addition, any person providing access or connection to or from an electronic method of remotely transferring information not under that person's control shall not be liable for any action voluntarily taken in good faith to block the receipt or transmission through its service of any information that it believes is, or will be sent, in violation of this section. (2) Division (F)(1) of this section does not create an affirmative duty for any person providing access or connection to or from an electronic method of remotely transferring information not under that person's control to block the receipt or transmission through its service of any information that it believes is, or will be sent, in violation of this section except as otherwise provided by law. (3) Division (F)(1) of this section does not apply to a person who conspires with a person actively involved in the creation or knowing distribution of material in violation of this section or who knowingly advertises the availability of material of that nature. Sec. 2903.22. (A)(1) No person shall knowingly cause another to believe that the offender will cause physical harm to the person or property of the other person, the other person's unborn, or a member of the other person's immediate family. In addition to any other basis for the other person's belief that the offender will cause physical harm to the person or property of the other person, the other person's unborn, or a member of the other person's immediate family, the other person's belief may be based on words or conduct of the offender that are directed at or identify a corporation, association, or other organization that employs the other person or to which the other person belongs. (2) No person shall knowingly place or attempt to place another in reasonable fear of physical harm or death by displaying a deadly weapon, regardless of whether the deadly weapon displayed is operable or inoperable, if eitherany of the following appliesapply: (a) The other person is an emergency service responder, the person knows or reasonably should know that the other person is an emergency service responder, and it is the person's specific purpose to engage in the specified conduct against an emergency service responder. (b) The other person is a family or household member or co-worker of an emergency service responder, the person knows or reasonably should know that the other person is a family or household member or co-worker of an emergency service responder, and it is the person's specific purpose to engage in the specified conduct against a family or household member or co-worker of an emergency service responder. (c) The other person is a person with a disability, the person knows or reasonably should know that the other person is a person with a disability, and it is the person's specific purpose to engage in the specified conduct against a person with a disability. (d) The other person is a family or household member or co-worker of a person with a disability, the person knows or reasonably should know that the other person is a family or household member or co-worker of a person with a disability, and it is the person's specific purpose to engage in the specified conduct against a family or household member or co-worker of a person with a disability. (B) Whoever violates this section is guilty of menacing. (1) Except as otherwise provided in this division or division (B)(2) of this section, menacing is a misdemeanor of the fourth degree. If the victim of the offense is an officer or employee of a public children services agency or a private child placing agency and the offense relates to the officer's or employee's performance or anticipated performance of official responsibilities or duties or if the victim of the offense is an emergency service responder in the performance of the responder's official duties, menacing is one of the following: (1)(a) Except as otherwise provided in division (B)(2)(B)(1)(b) of this section, a misdemeanor of the first degree; (2)(b) If the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to an offense of violence, the victim of that prior offense was an officer or employee of a public children services agency or private child placing agency or an emergency service responder, and that prior offense related to the officer's or employee's performance or anticipated performance of official responsibilities or duties or to the responder's performance of the responder's official duties, a felony of the fourth degree. (2) If the victim of the offense is a person with a disability and the offender knows or reasonably should know that the victim is a person with a disability, menacing is one of the following: (a) Except as otherwise provided in division (B)(2)(b) of this section, a misdemeanor of the first degree; (b) If the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to an offense of violence, the victim of that prior offense was a person with a disability and the offender knew or reasonably should have known the victim was a person with a disability, a felony of the fourth degree. (C) A prosecution for a violation of this section does not preclude a prosecution of a violation of any other section of the Revised Code. One or more acts, a series of acts, or a course of behavior that can be prosecuted under this section or any other section of the Revised Code may be prosecuted under this section, the other section of the Revised Code, or both sections. However, if an offender is convicted of or pleads guilty to a violation of this section and also is convicted of or pleads guilty to a violation of section 2903.13 of the Revised Code based on the same conduct involving the same victim that was the basis of the violation of this section, the two offenses are allied offenses of similar import under section 2941.25 of the Revised Code. (D) As used in this section: (1) "Emergency service responder," "family or household member," and "co-worker" have the same meanings as in section 2903.13 of the Revised Code. (2) "Organization" includes an entity that is a governmental employer. Sec. 2903.31. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Hazing" means doing any act or coercing another, including the victim, to do any act of initiation into any student or other organization or any act to continue or reinstate membership in or affiliation with any student or other organization that causes or creates a substantial risk of causing mental or physical harm to any person, including coercing another to consume alcohol or a drug of abuse, as defined in section 3719.011 of the Revised Code. (2) "Organization" includes a national or international organization with which a fraternity or sorority is affiliated. (B)(1) No person shall recklessly participate in the hazing of another. (2) No administrator, employee, faculty member, teacher, consultant, alumnus, or volunteer of any organization, including any primary, secondary, or post-secondary school or any other educational institution, public or private, shall recklessly permit the hazing of any person associated with the organization. (C)(1) No person shall recklessly participate in the hazing of another when the hazing includes coerced consumption of alcohol or drugs of abuse resulting in serious physical harm to the other person. (2) No administrator, employee, faculty member, teacher, consultant, alumnus, or volunteer of any organization, including any primary, secondary, or post-secondary school or any other educational institution, public or private, shall recklessly permit the hazing of any person associated with the organization when the hazing includes coerced consumption of alcohol or drugs of abuse resulting in serious physical harm to that person. (D) Whoever violates this section is guilty of hazing. AExcept as otherwise provided in this division, a violation of division (B)(1) or (2) of this section is a misdemeanor of the second degree. AIf the victim is a person with a disability, and the offender knows or reasonably should know that the victim is a person with a disability, a violation of division (B)(1) or (2) of this section is a misdemeanor of the first degree. Except as otherwise provided in this division, a violation of division (C)(1) or (2) of this section is a felony of the third degree. If the victim is a person with a disability, and the offender knows or reasonably should know that the victim is a person with a disability, a violation of division (C)(1) or (2) of this section is a felony of the second degree. Sec. 2905.01. (A) No person, by force, threat, or deception, or, in the case of a victim under the age of thirteen or mentally incompetenta victim who is a person with a disability whom the offender knows or reasonably should know is a person with a disability, by any means, shall remove another from the place where the other person is found or restrain the liberty of the other person, for any of the following purposes: (1) To hold for ransom, or as a shield or hostage; (2) To facilitate the commission of any felony or flight thereafter; (3) To terrorize, or to inflict serious physical harm on the victim or another; (4) To engage in sexual activity, as defined in section 2907.01 of the Revised Code, with the victim against the victim's will; (5) To hinder, impede, or obstruct a function of government, or to force any action or concession on the part of governmental authority; (6) To hold in a condition of involuntary servitude. (B) No person, by force, threat, or deception, or, in the case of a victim under the age of thirteen or mentally incompetenta victim who is a person with a disability whom the offender knows or reasonably should know is a person with a disability, by any means, shall knowingly do any of the following, under circumstances that create a substantial risk of serious physical harm to the victim or, in the case of a minor victim, under circumstances that either create a substantial risk of serious physical harm to the victim or cause physical harm to the victim: (1) Remove another from the place where the other person is found; (2) Restrain another of the other person's liberty. (C)(1) Whoever violates this section is guilty of kidnapping. Except as otherwise provided in this division or division (C)(2) or (3) of this section, kidnapping is a felony of the first degree. Except as otherwise provided in this division or division (C)(2) or (3) of this section, if an offender who violates division (A)(1) to (5), (B)(1), or (B)(2) of this section releases the victim in a safe place unharmed, kidnapping is a felony of the second degree. (2) If the offender in any case also is convicted of or pleads guilty to a specification as described in section 2941.1422 of the Revised Code that was included in the indictment, count in the indictment, or information charging the offense, the court shall order the offender to make restitution as provided in division (B)(8) of section 2929.18 of the Revised Code and, except as otherwise provided in division (C)(3) of this section, shall sentence the offender to a mandatory prison term as provided in division (B)(7) of section 2929.14 of the Revised Code. (3) If the victim of the offense is less than thirteen years of age and if the offender also is convicted of or pleads guilty to a sexual motivation specification that was included in the indictment, count in the indictment, or information charging the offense, kidnapping is a felony of the first degree, and, notwithstanding the definite or indefinite sentence provided for a felony of the first degree in section 2929.14 of the Revised Code, the offender shall be sentenced pursuant to section 2971.03 of the Revised Code as follows: (a) Except as otherwise provided in division (C)(3)(b) of this section, the offender shall be sentenced pursuant to that section to an indefinite prison term consisting of a minimum term of fifteen years and a maximum term of life imprisonment. (b) If the offender releases the victim in a safe place unharmed, the offender shall be sentenced pursuant to that section to an indefinite term consisting of a minimum term of ten years and a maximum term of life imprisonment. (D) As used in this section: (1) "Involuntary servitude" has the same meaning as in section 2905.31 of the Revised Code. (2) "Sexual motivation specification" has the same meaning as in section 2971.01 of the Revised Code. (3) "Disability" has the same meaning as in section 4112.01 of the Revised Code. Sec. 2905.11. (A) As used in this section and section 2905.111 of the Revised Code: (1) "Elderly person" and "disabled adult" have the same meanings as in section 2913.01 of the Revised Code. (2) "Information service" and "telecommunications service" have the same meanings as in the "Telecommunications Act of 1996," 47 U.S.C. 153, as amended. (3) "Interactive computer service" has the same meaning as in the "Telecommunications Act of 1996," 47 U.S.C. 230, as amended. (4) "Nudity," "sexual activity," and "sexual excitement" have the same meanings as in section 2907.01 of the Revised Code. (5) "Private images" means images of sexual activity, masturbation, sexual excitement, nudity, bestiality, extreme or bizarre violence, cruelty, or brutality, or human bodily functions of elimination. (6) "Threat" includes a direct threat and a threat by innuendo. (7) "Disability" has the same meaning as in section 4112.01 of the Revised Code. (B) No person, with purpose to obtain any valuable thing or valuable benefit or to induce another to do an unlawful act, shall do any of the following: (1) Threaten to commit any felony; (2) Threaten to commit any offense of violence; (3) Violate section 2903.21 or 2903.22 of the Revised Code; (4) Utter or threaten any calumny against any person; (5) Expose or threaten to expose any matter tending to subject any person to hatred, contempt, or ridicule, or to damage any person's personal or business repute, or to impair any person's credit. (C) Whoever violates division (B) of this section is guilty of extortion,. Except as otherwise provided in this division, extortion is a felony of the third degree. If the victim is a person with a disability and the offender knows or reasonably should know that the victim is a person with a disability, extortion is a felony of the second degree. (D) No person, with purpose to do any of the following, shall threaten to release, exhibit, or distribute the private images of another: (1) Compel or attempt to compel the other person, against the other person's will, to perform any act or refrain from performing any act; (2) Induce the other person to commit an offense; (3) Obtain additional private images from the other person; (4) Obtain anything of value from the other person. (E) Whoever violates division (D) of this section is guilty of sexual extortion. The penalty for the offense shall be determined as follows: (1) Except as otherwise provided in division (E)(2) or (3) of this section, sexual extortion is a felony of the third degree. (2) Except as otherwise provided in division (E)(3) of this section, if the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a violation of division (D) of this section or if the offense involves sexual extortion of a person under the age of eighteen, an elderly person, or a disabled adult, sexual extortion is a felony of the second degree. (3) If the offender has previously been convicted of or pleaded guilty to two or more violations of division (D) of this section or if the offender has previously been convicted of or pleaded guilty to an offense involving sexual extortion of a person under the age of eighteen, an elderly person, or a disabled adult and the offender knows or has reason to know that the person is under the age of eighteen, an elderly person, or a disabled adult, sexual extortion is a felony of the first degree. (F) A prosecution for a violation of division (D) of this section does not preclude a prosecution of a violation of division (B) of this section. One or more acts, a series of acts, or a course of behavior that can be prosecuted under division (D) of this section or division (B) of this section may be prosecuted under division (D) of this section, division (B) of this section, or both divisions. However, if an offender is convicted of or pleads guilty to a violation of division (D) of this section and also is convicted of or pleads guilty to a violation of division (B) of this section based on the same conduct involving the same victim that was the basis of the violation of division (D) of this section, the two offenses are allied offenses of similar import under section 2941.25 of the Revised Code. (G)(1) No person shall assert a cause of action in any court of this state against any provider of an information service, an interactive computer service, or a telecommunications service, or against any agent, employee, or officer of such provider, for any injury, death, or loss to person or property that allegedly arises out of the provider's, officer's, employee's, or agent's provision of information, facilities, or assistance in accordance with the terms of a court order that is issued in relation to the investigation or prosecution of an alleged violation of division (D) of this section. (2) A provider of an information service, an interactive computer service, or a telecommunications service, or any agent, employee, or officer of such provider, is immune from any civil or criminal liability for injury, death, or loss to person or property that allegedly arises out of the provider's, officer's, employee's, or agent's provision of information, facilities, or assistance in accordance with the terms of a court order that is issued in relation to the investigation or prosecution of an alleged violation of division (D) of this section. (H)(1)(a) A person shall not be considered to have violated division (D) of this section solely for providing access or connection to or from an electronic method of remotely transferring information not under that person's control, including having provided capabilities that are incidental to providing access or connection to or from the electronic method of remotely transferring the information and that do not include the creation of the content of the material that is the subject of the access or connection. (b) Any person providing access or connection to or from an electronic method of remotely transferring information not under that person's control shall not be liable for any action voluntarily taken in good faith to block the receipt or transmission through its service of any information that the person believes is, or will be, sent in violation of division (D) of this section. (2) Division (H)(1) of this section does not create an affirmative duty for any person providing access or connection to or from an electronic method of remotely transferring information not under that person's control to block the receipt or transmission through its service of any information that it believes is, or will be sent, in violation of division (D) of this section, except as otherwise provided by law. (3) Division (H)(1) of this section does not apply to a person who conspires with another person actively involved in the creation or knowing distribution of material in violation of division (D) of this section, or who knowingly advertises the availability of material of that nature. (4)(a) A provider or user of an interactive computer service shall neither be treated as the publisher nor speaker of any information provided by another information content provider, nor shall such a person be held civilly or criminally liable for the creation or development of information provided by another information content provider. (b) Nothing in division (H)(4)(a) of this section shall be construed as protecting a person from liability to the extent that the person developed or created any content in violation of division (D) of this section. Sec. 2905.12. (A) No person, with purpose to coerce another into taking or refraining from action concerning which the other person has a legal freedom of choice, shall do any of the following: (1) Threaten to commit any offense; (2) Utter or threaten any calumny against any person; (3) Expose or threaten to expose any matter tending to subject any person to hatred, contempt, or ridicule, to damage any person's personal or business repute, or to impair any person's credit; (4) Institute or threaten criminal proceedings against any person; (5) Take, withhold, or threaten to take or withhold official action, or cause or threaten to cause official action to be taken or withheld. (B) Divisions (A)(4) and (5) of this section shall not be construed to prohibit a prosecutor or court from doing any of the following in good faith and in the interests of justice: (1) Offering or agreeing to grant, or granting immunity from prosecution pursuant to section 2945.44 of the Revised Code; (2) In return for a plea of guilty to one or more offenses charged or to one or more other or lesser offenses, or in return for the testimony of the accused in a case to which the accused is not a party, offering or agreeing to dismiss, or dismissing one or more charges pending against an accused, or offering or agreeing to impose, or imposing a certain sentence or modification of sentence; (3) Imposing a community control sanction on certain conditions, including without limitation requiring the offender to make restitution or redress to the victim of the offense. (C) It is an affirmative defense to a charge under division (A)(3), (4), or (5) of this section that the actor's conduct was a reasonable response to the circumstances that occasioned it, and that the actor's purpose was limited to any of the following: (1) Compelling another to refrain from misconduct or to desist from further misconduct; (2) Preventing or redressing a wrong or injustice; (3) Preventing another from taking action for which the actor reasonably believed the other person to be disqualified; (4) Compelling another to take action that the actor reasonably believed the other person to be under a duty to take. (D) Whoever violates this section is guilty of coercion,. Except as otherwise provided in this division, coercion is a misdemeanor of the second degree. If the victim is a person with a disability and the offender knows or reasonably should know that the victim is a person with a disability, coercion is a misdemeanor of the first degree. (E) As used in this section: (1) "Threat" includes a direct threat and a threat by innuendo. (2) "Community control sanction" has the same meaning as in section 2929.01 of the Revised Code. (3) "Disability" has the same meaning as in section 4112.01 of the Revised Code. Sec. 2905.22. (A) As used in this section, "disability" has the same meaning as in section 4112.01 of the Revised Code. (B) No person shall: (1) Knowingly make or participate in an extortionate extension of credit; (2) Knowingly engage in criminal usury; (3) Possess any writing, paper, instrument, or article used to record criminally usurious transactions, knowing that the contents record a criminally usurious transaction. (B) Whoever(C) Except as otherwise provided in this division, whoever violates division (A)(1)(B)(1) or (2) of this section is guilty of a felony of the fourth degree. WhoeverIf the victim is a person with a disability and the offender knows or reasonably should know that the victim is a person with a disability, a violation of division (B)(1) or (2) of this section is a felony of the third degree. Except as otherwise provided in this division, whoever violates division (A)(3)(B)(3) of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the first degree. If the victim is a person with a disability and the offender knows or reasonably should know that the victim is a person with a disability, a violation of division (B)(3) of this section is a felony of the fifth degree. Sec. 2905.32. (A) No person shall knowingly recruit, lure, entice, isolate, harbor, transport, provide, obtain, or maintain, or knowingly attempt to recruit, lure, entice, isolate, harbor, transport, provide, obtain, or maintain, another person if either of the following applies: (1) The offender knows that the other person will be subjected to involuntary servitude or be compelled to engage in sexual activity for hire, engage in a performance that is obscene, sexually oriented, or nudity oriented, or be a model or participant in the production of material that is obscene, sexually oriented, or nudity oriented. (2) The other person is less than eighteen years of age or is a person with a developmental disability whom the offender knows or has reasonable cause to believe reasonably should know is a person with a developmental disability, and either the offender knows that the other person will be subjected to involuntary servitude or the offender's knowing recruitment, luring, enticement, isolation, harboring, transportation, provision, obtaining, or maintenance of the other person or knowing attempt to recruit, lure, entice, isolate, harbor, transport, provide, obtain, or maintain the other person is for any of the following purposes: (a) For the other person to engage in sexual activity for hire with one or more third parties; (b) To engage in a performance for hire that is obscene, sexually oriented, or nudity oriented; (c) To be a model or participant for hire in the production of material that is obscene, sexually oriented, or nudity oriented. (B) For a prosecution under division (A)(1) of this section, the element "compelled" does not require that the compulsion be openly displayed or physically exerted. The element "compelled" has been established if the state proves that the offender overcame the victim's will by force, fear, duress, intimidation, or fraud, by furnishing or offering a controlled substance to the victim, or by manipulating the victim's controlled substance addiction. (C) In a prosecution under this section, proof that the defendant engaged in sexual activity with any person, or solicited sexual activity with any person, whether or not for hire, without more, does not constitute a violation of this section. (D) A prosecution for a violation of this section does not preclude a prosecution of a violation of any other section of the Revised Code. One or more acts, a series of acts, or a course of behavior that can be prosecuted under this section or any other section of the Revised Code may be prosecuted under this section, the other section of the Revised Code, or both sections. However, if an offender is convicted of or pleads guilty to a violation of this section and also is convicted of or pleads guilty to a violation of section 2907.21 of the Revised Code based on the same conduct involving the same victim that was the basis of the violation of this section, or is convicted of or pleads guilty to any other violation of Chapter 2907. of the Revised Code based on the same conduct involving the same victim that was the basis of the violation of this section, the two offenses are allied offenses of similar import under section 2941.25 of the Revised Code. (E) Whoever violates this section is guilty of trafficking in persons, a felony of the first degree. For a violation committed prior to March 22, 2019, notwithstanding the range of definite terms set forth in division (A)(1)(b) of section 2929.14 of the Revised Code, the court shall sentence the offender to a definite prison term of ten, eleven, twelve, thirteen, fourteen, or fifteen years. For a violation committed on or after March 22, 2019, notwithstanding the range of minimum terms set forth in division (A)(1)(a) of section 2929.14 of the Revised Code, the court shall sentence the offender to an indefinite prison term pursuant to that division, with a minimum term under that sentence of ten, eleven, twelve, thirteen, fourteen, or fifteen years. (F) As used in this section: (1) "Person with a developmental disability" means a person whose ability to resist or consent to an act is substantially impaired because of a mental or physical condition or because of advanced age"Disability" has the same meaning as in section 4112.01 of the Revised Code. (2) "Sexual activity for hire," "performance for hire," and "model or participant for hire" mean an implicit or explicit agreement to provide sexual activity, engage in an obscene, sexually oriented, or nudity oriented performance, or be a model or participant in the production of obscene, sexually oriented, or nudity oriented material, whichever is applicable, in exchange for anything of value paid to any of the following: (a) The person engaging in such sexual activity, performance, or modeling or participation; (b) Any person who recruits, lures, entices, isolates, harbors, transports, provides, obtains, or maintains, or attempts to recruit, lure, entice, isolate, harbor, transport, provide, obtain, or maintain the person described in division (F)(2)(a) of this section; (c) Any person associated with a person described in division (F)(2)(a) or (b) of this section. (3) "Material that is obscene, sexually oriented, or nudity oriented" and "performance that is obscene, sexually oriented, or nudity oriented" have the same meanings as in section 2929.01 of the Revised Code. (4) "Third party" means, with respect to conduct described in division (A)(2)(a) of this section, any person other than the offender. Sec. 2907.03. (A) No person shall engage in sexual activity with another; cause another to engage in sexual activity with the offender; or cause two or more other persons to engage in sexual activity when any of the following apply: (1) The offender knowingly coerces the other person, or one of the other persons, to submit by any means that would prevent resistance by a person of ordinary resolution. (2) The offender knows that the other person's, or one of the other persons', ability to appraise the nature of or control the other person's own conduct is substantially impaired. (3) The offender knows that the other person, or one of the other persons, submits because the other person is unaware that the act is being committed. (4) The offender knows that the other person, or one of the other persons, submits because the other person mistakenly identifies the offender as the other person's spouse. (5) The offender is the other person's, or one of the other persons', natural or adoptive parent, or a stepparent, or guardian, custodian, or person in loco parentis of the other person. (6) The other person, or one of the other persons, is in custody of law or a patient in a hospital or other institution, and the offender has supervisory or disciplinary authority over the other person. (7) The offender is a teacher, administrator, coach, or other person in authority employed by or serving in a school for which the director of education and workforce prescribes minimum standards pursuant to division (D) of section 3301.07 of the Revised Code, the other person, or one of the other persons, is enrolled in or attends that school, and the offender is not enrolled in and does not attend that school. (8) The other person, or one of the other persons, is a minor, the offender is a teacher, administrator, coach, or other person in authority employed by or serving in an institution of higher education, and the other person is enrolled in or attends that institution. (9) The other person, or one of the other persons, is a minor, and the offender is the other person's athletic or other type of coach, is the other person's instructor, is the leader of a scouting troop of which the other person is a member, or is a person with temporary or occasional disciplinary control over the other person. (10) The offender is a mental health professional, the other person, or one of the other persons, is a mental health client or patient of the offender, and the offender induces the other person to submit by falsely representing to the other person that the sexual activity is necessary for mental health treatment purposes. (11) The offender is a licensed medical professional, the other person, or one of the other persons, is a patient of the offender, and the sexual activity occurs in the course of medical treatment. (12) The other person, or one of the other persons, is confined in a detention facility, and the offender is an employee of that detention facility. (13) The other person, or one of the other persons, is a minor, the offender is a cleric, and the other person is a member of, or attends, the church or congregation served by the cleric. (14) The other person, or one of the other persons, is a minor, the offender is a peace officer, and the offender is more than two years older than the other person. (B) Whoever violates this section is guilty of sexual battery. (1) If the sexual activity involved is sexual conduct, except as otherwise provided in this division, sexual battery is a felony of the third degree. If the other person, or one of the other persons, is thirteen years of age or over and less than eighteen years of age, or if the other person is a person with a disability and the offender knows or reasonably should know that the other person is a person with a disability, sexual battery is a felony of the second degree, and the court shall impose upon the offender a mandatory prison term equal to one of the definite prison terms prescribed in division (A)(2)(b) of section 2929.14 of the Revised Code for a felony of the second degree, except that if the violation is committed on or after March 22, 2019, the court shall impose as the minimum prison term for the offense a mandatory prison term that is one of the minimum terms prescribed in division (A)(2)(a) of that section for a felony of the second degree. (2) If the sexual activity involved is sexual contact, except as otherwise provided in this division, sexual battery is a felony of the fifth degree. If the other person, or one of the other persons, is less than eighteen years of age, sexual battery is a felony of the fourth degree. (C) As used in this section: (1) "Cleric" has the same meaning as in section 2317.02 of the Revised Code. (2) "Detention facility" has the same meaning as in section 2921.01 of the Revised Code. (3)"Disability" has the same meaning as in section 4112.01 of the Revised Code. (4) "Institution of higher education" means a state institution of higher education defined in section 3345.011 of the Revised Code, a private nonprofit college or university located in this state that possesses a certificate of authorization issued by the chancellor of higher education pursuant to Chapter 1713. of the Revised Code, or a school certified under Chapter 3332. of the Revised Code. (4)(5) "Peace officer" has the same meaning as in section 2935.01 of the Revised Code. (5)(6) "Medical treatment" means in-person medical services provided by a licensed medical professional under the legal authority conferred by a license or certificate, including in-person examination, consultation, health care, treatment, procedure, surgery, or other in-person procedures. Sec. 2907.05. (A) No person shall have sexual contact with another; cause another to have sexual contact with the offender; or cause two or more other persons to have sexual contact when any of the following applies: (1) The offender purposely compels the other person, or one of the other persons, to submit by force or threat of force. (2) For the purpose of preventing resistance, the offender substantially impairs the judgment or control of the other person or of one of the other persons by administering any drug, intoxicant, or controlled substance to the other person surreptitiously or by force, threat of force, or deception. (3) The offender knows that the judgment or control of the other person or of one of the other persons is substantially impaired as a result of the influence of any drug or intoxicant administered to the other person with the other person's consent for the purpose of any kind of medical or dental examination, treatment, or surgery. (4) The other person, or one of the other persons, is less than thirteen years of age, whether or not the offender knows the age of that person. (5) The ability of the other person to resist or consent or the ability of one of the other persons to resist or consent is substantially impaired because of a mental or physical condition or because of advanced age, and the offender knows or has reasonable cause to believe that the ability to resist or consent of the other person or of one of the other persons is substantially impaired because of a mental or physical condition or because of advanced age. (B) No person shall knowingly touch the genitalia of another, when the touching is not through clothing, the other person is less than twelve years of age, whether or not the offender knows the age of that person, and the touching is done with an intent to abuse, humiliate, harass, degrade, or arouse or gratify the sexual desire of any person. (C) Whoever violates this section is guilty of gross sexual imposition. (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, gross sexual imposition committed in violation of division (A)(1), (2), or (3), or (5) of this section is a felony of the fourth degree. If the offender under division (A)(2) of this section substantially impairs the judgment or control of the other person or one of the other persons by administering any controlled substance, as defined in section 3719.01 of the Revised Code, to the person surreptitiously or by force, threat of force, or deception, gross sexual imposition committed in violation of division (A)(2) of this section is a felony of the third degree. (2) Gross sexual imposition committed in violation of division (A)(4) or (5) or (B) of this section is a felony of the third degree. Except as otherwise provided in this division, for gross sexual imposition committed in violation of division (A)(4) or (5) or (B) of this section there is a presumption that a prison term shall be imposed for the offense. The court shall impose on an offender convicted of gross sexual imposition in violation of division (A)(4) or (5) or (B) of this section a mandatory prison term, as described in division (C)(3) of this section, for a felony of the third degree if the offender previously was convicted of or pleaded guilty to a violation of this section, rape, the former offense of felonious sexual penetration, or sexual battery, and the victim of the previous offense was less than thirteen years of age. (3) A mandatory prison term required under division (C)(2) of this section shall be a definite term from the range of prison terms provided in division (A)(3)(a) of section 2929.14 of the Revised Code for a felony of the third degree. (D) A victim need not prove physical resistance to the offender in prosecutions under this section. (E) Evidence of specific instances of the victim's sexual activity, opinion evidence of the victim's sexual activity, and reputation evidence of the victim's sexual activity shall not be admitted under this section unless it involves evidence of the origin of semen, pregnancy, or sexually transmitted disease or infection, or the victim's past sexual activity with the offender, and only to the extent that the court finds that the evidence is material to a fact at issue in the case and that its inflammatory or prejudicial nature does not outweigh its probative value. Evidence of specific instances of the defendant's sexual activity, opinion evidence of the defendant's sexual activity, and reputation evidence of the defendant's sexual activity shall not be admitted under this section unless it involves evidence of the origin of semen, pregnancy, or sexually transmitted disease or infection, the defendant's past sexual activity with the victim, or is admissible against the defendant under section 2945.59 of the Revised Code, and only to the extent that the court finds that the evidence is material to a fact at issue in the case and that its inflammatory or prejudicial nature does not outweigh its probative value. (F) Prior to taking testimony or receiving evidence of any sexual activity of the victim or the defendant in a proceeding under this section, the court shall resolve the admissibility of the proposed evidence in a hearing in chambers, which shall be held at or before preliminary hearing and not less than three days before trial, or for good cause shown during the trial. (G) Upon approval by the court, the victim may be represented by counsel in any hearing in chambers or other proceeding to resolve the admissibility of evidence. If the victim is indigent or otherwise is unable to obtain the services of counsel, the court, upon request, may appoint counsel to represent the victim without cost to the victim. Sec. 2909.01. As used in sections 2909.01 to 2909.07 of the Revised Code: (A) To "create a substantial risk of serious physical harm to any person" includes the creation of a substantial risk of serious physical harm to any emergency personnel. (B) "Emergency personnel" means any of the following persons: (1) A peace officer, as defined in section 2935.01 of the Revised Code; (2) A member of a fire department or other firefighting agency of a municipal corporation, township, township fire district, joint fire district, other political subdivision, or combination of political subdivisions; (3) A member of a private fire company, as defined in section 9.60 of the Revised Code, or a volunteer firefighter; (4) A member of a joint ambulance district or joint emergency medical services district; (5) An emergency medical technician-basic, emergency medical technician-intermediate, emergency medical technician-paramedic, ambulance operator, or other member of an emergency medical service that is owned or operated by a political subdivision or a private entity; (6) The state fire marshal, the chief deputy state fire marshal, or an assistant state fire marshal; (7) A fire prevention officer of a political subdivision or an arson, fire, or similar investigator of a political subdivision. (C) "Occupied structure" means any house, building, outbuilding, watercraft, aircraft, railroad car, truck, trailer, tent, or other structure, vehicle, or shelter, or any portion thereof, to which any of the following applies: (1) It is maintained as a permanent or temporary dwelling, even though it is temporarily unoccupied and whether or not any person is actually present. (2) At the time, it is occupied as the permanent or temporary habitation of any person, whether or not any person is actually present. (3) At the time, it is specially adapted for the overnight accommodation of any person, whether or not any person is actually present. (4) At the time, any person is present or likely to be present in it. (D) "Political subdivision" and "state" have the same meanings as in section 2744.01 of the Revised Code. (E) "Computer," "computer hacking," "computer network," "computer program," "computer software," "computer system," "data," and "telecommunications device" have the same meanings as in section 2913.01 of the Revised Code. (F) "Computer contaminant" means a computer program that is designed to modify, damage, destroy, disable, deny or degrade access to, allow unauthorized access to, functionally impair, record, or transmit information within a computer, computer system, or computer network without the express or implied consent of the owner or other person authorized to give consent and that is of a type or kind described in divisions (F)(1) to (4) of this section or of a type or kind similar to a type or kind described in divisions (F)(1) to (4) of this section: (1) A group of computer programs commonly known as "viruses" and "worms" that are self-replicating or self-propagating and that are designed to contaminate other computer programs, compromise computer security, consume computer resources, modify, destroy, record, or transmit data, or disrupt the normal operation of the computer, computer system, or computer network; (2) A group of computer programs commonly known as "Trojans" or "Trojan horses" that are not self-replicating or self-propagating and that are designed to compromise computer security, consume computer resources, modify, destroy, record, or transmit data, or disrupt the normal operation of the computer, computer system, or computer network; (3) A group of computer programs commonly known as "zombies" that are designed to use a computer without the knowledge and consent of the owner, or other person authorized to give consent, and that are designed to send large quantities of data to a targeted computer network for the purpose of degrading the targeted computer's or network's performance, or denying access through the network to the targeted computer or network, resulting in what is commonly known as "Denial of Service" or "Distributed Denial of Service" attacks; (4) A group of computer programs commonly know as "trap doors," "back doors," or "root kits" that are designed to bypass standard authentication software and that are designed to allow access to or use of a computer without the knowledge or consent of the owner, or other person authorized to give consent. (G) "Internet" has the same meaning as in section 341.42 of the Revised Code. (H) "Disability" has the same meaning as in section 4112.01 of the Revised Code. Sec. 2909.06. (A) No person shall cause, or create a substantial risk of physical harm to any property of another without the other person's consent: (1) Knowingly, by any means; (2) Recklessly, by means of fire, explosion, flood, poison gas, poison, radioactive material, caustic or corrosive material, or other inherently dangerous agency or substance. (B) Whoever violates this section is guilty of criminal damaging or endangering, a. Except as otherwise provided in this division or division (C) of this section, criminal damaging or endangering is a misdemeanor of the second degree. If a violation of this section creates a risk of physical harm to any person, criminal damaging or endangering is a misdemeanor of the first degree. If the property involved in a violation of this section is an aircraft, an aircraft engine, propeller, appliance, spare part, or any other equipment or implement used or intended to be used in the operation of an aircraft and if the violation creates a risk of physical harm to any person, criminal damaging or endangering is a felony of the fifth degree. If the property involved in a violation of this section is an aircraft, an aircraft engine, propeller, appliance, spare part, or any other equipment or implement used or intended to be used in the operation of an aircraft and if the violation creates a substantial risk of physical harm to any person or if the property involved in a violation of this section is an occupied aircraft, criminal damaging or endangering is a felony of the fourth degree. (C) If the victim is a person with a disability and the offender knows or reasonably should know that the victim is a person with a disability, criminal damaging is a misdemeanor of the first degree. If a violation of this section creates a risk of physical harm to any person with a disability and the offender knows or reasonably should know that the victim is a person with a disability, criminal damaging or endangering is a felony of the fifth degree. If the property involved in a violation of this section is an aircraft, an aircraft engine, propeller, appliance, spare part, or any other equipment or implement used or intended to be used in the operation of an aircraft and if the violation creates a risk of physical harm to a person with a disability and the offender knows or reasonably should know that the victim is a person with a disability, criminal damaging or endangering is a felony of the fourth degree. If the property involved in a violation of this section is an aircraft, an aircraft engine, propeller, appliance, spare part, or any other equipment or implement used or intended to be used in the operation of an aircraft and if the violation creates a substantial risk of physical harm to a person with a disability and the offender knows or reasonably should know that the victim is a person with a disability, criminal damaging or endangering is a felony of the third degree. Sec. 2909.07. (A) No person shall: (1) Without privilege to do so, knowingly move, deface, damage, destroy, or otherwise improperly tamper with either of the following: (a) The property of another; (b) One's own residential real property with the purpose to decrease the value of or enjoyment of the residential real property, if both of the following apply: (i) The residential real property is subject to a mortgage. (ii) The person has been served with a summons and complaint in a pending residential mortgage loan foreclosure action relating to that real property. As used in this division, "pending" includes the time between judgment entry and confirmation of sale. (2) With purpose to interfere with the use or enjoyment of property of another, employ a tear gas device, stink bomb, smoke generator, or other device releasing a substance that is harmful or offensive to persons exposed or that tends to cause public alarm; (3) Without privilege to do so, knowingly move, deface, damage, destroy, or otherwise improperly tamper with a bench mark, triangulation station, boundary marker, or other survey station, monument, or marker; (4) Without privilege to do so, knowingly move, deface, damage, destroy, or otherwise improperly tamper with any safety device, the property of another, or the property of the offender when required or placed for the safety of others, so as to destroy or diminish its effectiveness or availability for its intended purpose; (5) With purpose to interfere with the use or enjoyment of the property of another, set a fire on the land of another or place personal property that has been set on fire on the land of another, which fire or personal property is outside and apart from any building, other structure, or personal property that is on that land; (6) Without privilege to do so, and with intent to impair the functioning of any computer, computer system, computer network, computer software, or computer program, knowingly do any of the following: (a) In any manner or by any means, including, but not limited to, computer hacking, alter, damage, destroy, or modify a computer, computer system, computer network, computer software, or computer program or data contained in a computer, computer system, computer network, computer software, or computer program; (b) Introduce a computer contaminant into a computer, computer system, computer network, computer software, or computer program. (7) Without privilege to do so, knowingly destroy or improperly tamper with a critical infrastructure facility. (B) As used in this section: (1) "Safety device" means any fire extinguisher, fire hose, or fire axe, or any fire escape, emergency exit, or emergency escape equipment, or any life line, life-saving ring, life preserver, or life boat or raft, or any alarm, light, flare, signal, sign, or notice intended to warn of danger or emergency, or intended for other safety purposes, or any guard railing or safety barricade, or any traffic sign or signal, or any railroad grade crossing sign, signal, or gate, or any first aid or survival equipment, or any other device, apparatus, or equipment intended for protecting or preserving the safety of persons or property. (2) "Critical infrastructure facility" has the same meaning as in section 2911.21 of the Revised Code. (3) "Improperly tamper" means to change the physical location or the physical condition of the property. (C)(1) Whoever violates this section is guilty of criminal mischief, and shall be punished as provided in division (C)(2), (3), or (4) of this section. (2) Except as otherwise provided in this division, criminal mischief committed in violation of division (A)(1), (2), (3), (4), or (5) of this section is a misdemeanor of the third degree. Except as otherwise provided in this division, if the victim is a person with a disability and the offender knows or reasonably should know that the victim is a person with a disability, criminal mischief committed in violation of division (A)(1), (2), (3), (4), or (5) of this section is a misdemeanor of the second degree. Except as otherwise provided in this division, if the violation of division (A)(1), (2), (3), (4), or (5) of this section creates a risk of physical harm to any person, criminal mischief committed in violation of division (A)(1), (2), (3), (4), or (5) of this section is a misdemeanor of the first degree. If the property involved in the violation of division (A)(1), (2), (3), (4), or (5) of this section is an aircraft, an aircraft engine, propeller, appliance, spare part, fuel, lubricant, hydraulic fluid, any other equipment, implement, or material used or intended to be used in the operation of an aircraft, or any cargo carried or intended to be carried in an aircraft, criminal mischief committed in violation of division (A)(1), (2), (3), (4), or (5) of this section is one of the following: (a) If the violation creates a risk of physical harm to any person, except as otherwise provided in division (C)(2)(b) of this section, criminal mischief committed in violation of division (A)(1), (2), (3), (4), or (5) of this section is a felony of the fifth degree. (b) If the violation creates a substantial risk of physical harm to any person or if the property involved in a violation of this section is an occupied aircraft, criminal mischief committed in violation of division (A)(1), (2), (3), (4), or (5) of this section is a felony of the fourth degree. (3) Except as otherwise provided in this division, criminal mischief committed in violation of division (A)(6) of this section is a misdemeanor of the first degree. Except as otherwise provided in this division, if the value of the computer, computer system, computer network, computer software, computer program, or data involved in the violation of division (A)(6) of this section or the loss to the victim resulting from the violation is one thousand dollars or more and less than ten thousand dollars, or if the computer, computer system, computer network, computer software, computer program, or data involved in the violation of division (A)(6) of this section is used or intended to be used in the operation of an aircraft and the violation creates a risk of physical harm to any person, criminal mischief committed in violation of division (A)(6) of this section is a felony of the fifth degree. If the value of the computer, computer system, computer network, computer software, computer program, or data involved in the violation of division (A)(6) of this section or the loss to the victim resulting from the violation is ten thousand dollars or more, or if the computer, computer system, computer network, computer software, computer program, or data involved in the violation of division (A)(6) of this section is used or intended to be used in the operation of an aircraft and the violation creates a substantial risk of physical harm to any person or the aircraft in question is an occupied aircraft, criminal mischief committed in violation of division (A)(6) of this section is a felony of the fourth degree. (4) Except as otherwise provided in this division, if the victim is a person with a disability and the offender knows or reasonably should know that the victim is a person with a disability, criminal mischief committed in violation of division (A)(6) of this section is a felony of the fifth degree. If the victim is a person with a disability and the offender knows or reasonably should know that the victim is a person with a disability, and if the value of the computer, computer system, computer network, computer software, computer program, or data involved in the violation of division (A)(6) of this section or the loss to the victim resulting from the violation is one thousand dollars or more and less than ten thousand dollars, criminal mischief committed in violation of division (A)(6) of this section is a felony of the fourth degree. If the victim is a person with a disability and the offender knows or reasonably should know that the victim is a person with a disability, and the value of the computer, computer system, computer network, computer software, computer program, or data involved in the violation of division (A)(6) of this section or the loss to the victim resulting from the violation is ten thousand dollars or more, criminal mischief committed in violation of division (A)(6) of this section is a felony of the third degree. (5) Criminal mischief committed in violation of division (A)(7) of this section is a felony of the third degree. Sec. 2911.02. (A) No person, in attempting or committing a theft offense or in fleeing immediately after the attempt or offense, shall do any of the following: (1) Have a deadly weapon on or about the offender's person or under the offender's control; (2) Inflict, attempt to inflict, or threaten to inflict physical harm on another; (3) Use or threaten the immediate use of force against another. (B) Whoever violates this section is guilty of robbery. AExcept as otherwise provided in this division, a violation of division (A)(1) or (2) of this section is a felony of the second degree. AIf the victim is a person with a disability and the offender knows or reasonably should know that the victim is a person with a disability, robbery committed in violation of division (A)(1) or (2) of this section is a felony of the first degree. Except as otherwise provided in this division, a violation of division (A)(3) of this section is a felony of the third degree. If the victim is a person with a disability, and the offender knows or reasonably should know that the victim is a person with a disability, robbery committed in violation of division (A)(3) of this section is a felony of the second degree. (C) As used in this section: (1) "Deadly weapon" has the same meaning as in section 2923.11 of the Revised Code. (2) "Disability" has the same meaning as in section 4112.01 of the Revised Code. (3) "Theft offense" has the same meaning as in section 2913.01 of the Revised Code. Sec. 2911.12. (A) No person, by force, stealth, or deception, shall do any of the following: (1) Trespass in an occupied structure or in a separately secured or separately occupied portion of an occupied structure, when another person other than an accomplice of the offender is present, with purpose to commit in the structure or in the separately secured or separately occupied portion of the structure any criminal offense; (2) Trespass in an occupied structure or in a separately secured or separately occupied portion of an occupied structure that is a permanent or temporary habitation of any person when any person other than an accomplice of the offender is present or likely to be present, with purpose to commit in the habitation any criminal offense; (3) Trespass in an occupied structure or in a separately secured or separately occupied portion of an occupied structure, with purpose to commit in the structure or separately secured or separately occupied portion of the structure any criminal offense. (B) No person, by force, stealth, or deception, shall trespass in a permanent or temporary habitation of any person when any person other than an accomplice of the offender is present or likely to be present. (C) As used in this section, "occupied: (1) "Occupied structure" has the same meaning as in section 2909.01 of the Revised Code. (2) "Disability" has the same meaning as in section 4112.01 of the Revised Code. (D) Whoever violates division (A) of this section is guilty of burglary. AExcept as otherwise provided in this division, a violation of division (A)(1) or (2) of this section is a felony of the second degree. AIf the victim is a person with a disability and the offender knows or reasonably should know that the victim is a person with a disability, burglary committed in violation of division (A)(1) or (2) of this section is a felony of the first degree. Except as otherwise provided in this division, a violation of division (A)(3) of this section is a felony of the third degree. If the victim is a person with a disability and the offender knows or reasonably should know that the victim is a person with a disability, burglary committed in violation of division (A)(3) of this section is a felony of the second degree. (E) Whoever violates division (B) of this section is guilty of trespass in a habitation when a person is present or likely to be present, a. Except as otherwise provided in this division, trespass in a habitation when a person is present or likely to be present is a felony of the fourth degree. If the victim is a person with a disability and the offender knows or reasonably should know that the victim is a person with a disability, trespass in a habitation when a person is present or likely to be present is a felony of the third degree. Sec. 2913.01. As used in this chapter, unless the context requires that a term be given a different meaning: (A) "Deception" means knowingly deceiving another or causing another to be deceived by any false or misleading representation, by withholding information, by preventing another from acquiring information, or by any other conduct, act, or omission that creates, confirms, or perpetuates a false impression in another, including a false impression as to law, value, state of mind, or other objective or subjective fact. (B) "Defraud" means to knowingly obtain, by deception, some benefit for oneself or another, or to knowingly cause, by deception, some detriment to another. (C) "Deprive" means to do any of the following: (1) Withhold property of another permanently, or for a period that appropriates a substantial portion of its value or use, or with purpose to restore it only upon payment of a reward or other consideration; (2) Dispose of property so as to make it unlikely that the owner will recover it; (3) Accept, use, or appropriate money, property, or services, with purpose not to give proper consideration in return for the money, property, or services, and without reasonable justification or excuse for not giving proper consideration. (D) "Owner" means, unless the context requires a different meaning, any person, other than the actor, who is the owner of, who has possession or control of, or who has any license or interest in property or services, even though the ownership, possession, control, license, or interest is unlawful. (E) "Services" include labor, personal services, professional services, rental services, public utility services including wireless service as defined in division (F)(1) of section 128.01 of the Revised Code, common carrier services, and food, drink, transportation, entertainment, and cable television services and, for purposes of section 2913.04 of the Revised Code, include cable services as defined in that section. (F) "Writing" means any computer software, document, letter, memorandum, note, paper, plate, data, film, or other thing having in or upon it any written, typewritten, or printed matter, and any token, stamp, seal, credit card, badge, trademark, label, or other symbol of value, right, privilege, license, or identification. (G) "Forge" means to fabricate or create, in whole or in part and by any means, any spurious writing, or to make, execute, alter, complete, reproduce, or otherwise purport to authenticate any writing, when the writing in fact is not authenticated by that conduct. (H) "Utter" means to issue, publish, transfer, use, put or send into circulation, deliver, or display. (I) "Coin machine" means any mechanical or electronic device designed to do both of the following: (1) Receive a coin, bill, or token made for that purpose; (2) In return for the insertion or deposit of a coin, bill, or token, automatically dispense property, provide a service, or grant a license. (J) "Slug" means an object that, by virtue of its size, shape, composition, or other quality, is capable of being inserted or deposited in a coin machine as an improper substitute for a genuine coin, bill, or token made for that purpose. (K) "Theft offense" means any of the following: (1) A violation of section 2911.01, 2911.02, 2911.11, 2911.12, 2911.13, 2911.31, 2911.32, 2913.02, 2913.03, 2913.04, 2913.041, 2913.05, 2913.06, 2913.08, 2913.11, 2913.21, 2913.31, 2913.32, 2913.33, 2913.34, 2913.40, 2913.42, 2913.43, 2913.44, 2913.45, 2913.47, 2913.48, former section 2913.47 or 2913.48, or section 2913.51, 2915.05, or 2921.41 of the Revised Code; (2) A violation of an existing or former municipal ordinance or law of this or any other state, or of the United States, substantially equivalent to any section listed in division (K)(1) of this section or a violation of section 2913.41, 2913.81, or 2915.06 of the Revised Code as it existed prior to July 1, 1996; (3) An offense under an existing or former municipal ordinance or law of this or any other state, or of the United States, involving robbery, burglary, breaking and entering, theft, embezzlement, wrongful conversion, forgery, counterfeiting, deceit, or fraud; (4) A conspiracy or attempt to commit, or complicity in committing, any offense under division (K)(1), (2), or (3) of this section. (L) "Computer services" includes, but is not limited to, the use of a computer system, computer network, computer program, data that is prepared for computer use, or data that is contained within a computer system or computer network. (M) "Computer" means an electronic device that performs logical, arithmetic, and memory functions by the manipulation of electronic or magnetic impulses. "Computer" includes, but is not limited to, all input, output, processing, storage, computer program, or communication facilities that are connected, or related, in a computer system or network to an electronic device of that nature. (N) "Computer system" means a computer and related devices, whether connected or unconnected, including, but not limited to, data input, output, and storage devices, data communications links, and computer programs and data that make the system capable of performing specified special purpose data processing tasks. (O) "Computer network" means a set of related and remotely connected computers and communication facilities that includes more than one computer system that has the capability to transmit among the connected computers and communication facilities through the use of computer facilities. (P) "Computer program" means an ordered set of data representing coded instructions or statements that, when executed by a computer, cause the computer to process data. (Q) "Computer software" means computer programs, procedures, and other documentation associated with the operation of a computer system. (R) "Data" means a representation of information, knowledge, facts, concepts, or instructions that are being or have been prepared in a formalized manner and that are intended for use in a computer, computer system, or computer network. For purposes of section 2913.47 of the Revised Code, "data" has the additional meaning set forth in division (A) of that section. (S) "Cable television service" means any services provided by or through the facilities of any cable television system or other similar closed circuit coaxial cable communications system, or any microwave or similar transmission service used in connection with any cable television system or other similar closed circuit coaxial cable communications system. (T) "Gain access" means to approach, instruct, communicate with, store data in, retrieve data from, or otherwise make use of any resources of a computer, computer system, or computer network, or any cable service or cable system both as defined in section 2913.04 of the Revised Code. (U) "Credit card" includes, but is not limited to, a card, code, device, or other means of access to a customer's account for the purpose of obtaining money, property, labor, or services on credit, or for initiating an electronic fund transfer at a point-of-sale terminal, an automated teller machine, or a cash dispensing machine. It also includes a county procurement card issued under section 301.29 of the Revised Code. (V) "Electronic fund transfer" has the same meaning as in 92 Stat. 3728, 15 U.S.C.A. 1693a, as amended. (W) "Rented property" means personal property in which the right of possession and use of the property is for a short and possibly indeterminate term in return for consideration; the rentee generally controls the duration of possession of the property, within any applicable minimum or maximum term; and the amount of consideration generally is determined by the duration of possession of the property. (X) "Telecommunication" means the origination, emission, dissemination, transmission, or reception of data, images, signals, sounds, or other intelligence or equivalence of intelligence of any nature over any communications system by any method, including, but not limited to, a fiber optic, electronic, magnetic, optical, digital, or analog method. (Y) "Telecommunications device" means any instrument, equipment, machine, or other device that facilitates telecommunication, including, but not limited to, a computer, computer network, computer chip, computer circuit, scanner, telephone, cellular telephone, pager, personal communications device, transponder, receiver, radio, modem, or device that enables the use of a modem. (Z) "Telecommunications service" means the providing, allowing, facilitating, or generating of any form of telecommunication through the use of a telecommunications device over a telecommunications system. (AA) "Counterfeit telecommunications device" means a telecommunications device that, alone or with another telecommunications device, has been altered, constructed, manufactured, or programmed to acquire, intercept, receive, or otherwise facilitate the use of a telecommunications service or information service without the authority or consent of the provider of the telecommunications service or information service. "Counterfeit telecommunications device" includes, but is not limited to, a clone telephone, clone microchip, tumbler telephone, or tumbler microchip; a wireless scanning device capable of acquiring, intercepting, receiving, or otherwise facilitating the use of telecommunications service or information service without immediate detection; or a device, equipment, hardware, or software designed for, or capable of, altering or changing the electronic serial number in a wireless telephone. (BB)(1) "Information service" means, subject to division (BB)(2) of this section, the offering of a capability for generating, acquiring, storing, transforming, processing, retrieving, utilizing, or making available information via telecommunications, including, but not limited to, electronic publishing. (2) "Information service" does not include any use of a capability of a type described in division (BB)(1) of this section for the management, control, or operation of a telecommunications system or the management of a telecommunications service. (CC) "Elderly person" means a person who is sixty-five years of age or older. (DD) "Disabled adult" means a person who is eighteen years of age or older and has some impairment of body or mind that makes the person unable to work at any substantially remunerative employment that the person otherwise would be able to perform and that will, with reasonable probability, continue for a period of at least twelve months without any present indication of recovery from the impairment, or who is eighteen years of age or older and has been certified as permanently and totally disabled by an agency of this state or the United States that has the function of so classifying persons"Disability" has the same meaning as in section 4112.01 of the Revised Code. (EE) "Firearm" and "dangerous ordnance" have the same meanings as in section 2923.11 of the Revised Code. (FF) "Motor vehicle" has the same meaning as in section 4501.01 of the Revised Code. (GG) "Dangerous drug" has the same meaning as in section 4729.01 of the Revised Code. (HH) "Drug abuse offense" has the same meaning as in section 2925.01 of the Revised Code. (II)(1) "Computer hacking" means any of the following: (a) Gaining access or attempting to gain access to all or part of a computer, computer system, or a computer network without express or implied authorization with the intent to defraud or with intent to commit a crime; (b) Misusing computer or network services including, but not limited to, mail transfer programs, file transfer programs, proxy servers, and web servers by performing functions not authorized by the owner of the computer, computer system, or computer network or other person authorized to give consent. As used in this division, "misuse of computer and network services" includes, but is not limited to, the unauthorized use of any of the following: (i) Mail transfer programs to send mail to persons other than the authorized users of that computer or computer network; (ii) File transfer program proxy services or proxy servers to access other computers, computer systems, or computer networks; (iii) Web servers to redirect users to other web pages or web servers. (c)(i) Subject to division (II)(1)(c)(ii) of this section, using a group of computer programs commonly known as "port scanners" or "probes" to intentionally access any computer, computer system, or computer network without the permission of the owner of the computer, computer system, or computer network or other person authorized to give consent. The group of computer programs referred to in this division includes, but is not limited to, those computer programs that use a computer network to access a computer, computer system, or another computer network to determine any of the following: the presence or types of computers or computer systems on a network; the computer network's facilities and capabilities; the availability of computer or network services; the presence or versions of computer software including, but not limited to, operating systems, computer services, or computer contaminants; the presence of a known computer software deficiency that can be used to gain unauthorized access to a computer, computer system, or computer network; or any other information about a computer, computer system, or computer network not necessary for the normal and lawful operation of the computer initiating the access. (ii) The group of computer programs referred to in division (II)(1)(c)(i) of this section does not include standard computer software used for the normal operation, administration, management, and test of a computer, computer system, or computer network including, but not limited to, domain name services, mail transfer services, and other operating system services, computer programs commonly called "ping," "tcpdump," and "traceroute" and other network monitoring and management computer software, and computer programs commonly known as "nslookup" and "whois" and other systems administration computer software. (d) The intentional use of a computer, computer system, or a computer network in a manner that exceeds any right or permission granted by the owner of the computer, computer system, or computer network or other person authorized to give consent. (2) "Computer hacking" does not include the introduction of a computer contaminant, as defined in section 2909.01 of the Revised Code, into a computer, computer system, computer program, or computer network. (JJ) "Police dog or horse" has the same meaning as in section 2921.321 of the Revised Code. (KK) "Anhydrous ammonia" is a compound formed by the combination of two gaseous elements, nitrogen and hydrogen, in the manner described in this division. Anhydrous ammonia is one part nitrogen to three parts hydrogen (NH3). Anhydrous ammonia by weight is fourteen parts nitrogen to three parts hydrogen, which is approximately eighty-two per cent nitrogen to eighteen per cent hydrogen. (LL) "Assistance dog" has the same meaning as in section 955.011 of the Revised Code. (MM) "Federally licensed firearms dealer" has the same meaning as in section 5502.63 of the Revised Code. (NN) "Active duty service member" means any member of the armed forces of the United States performing active duty under title 10 of the United States Code. Sec. 2913.02. (A) No person, with purpose to deprive the owner of property or services, shall knowingly obtain or exert control over either the property or services in any of the following ways: (1) Without the consent of the owner or person authorized to give consent; (2) Beyond the scope of the express or implied consent of the owner or person authorized to give consent; (3) By deception; (4) By threat; (5) By intimidation. (B)(1) Whoever violates this section is guilty of theft. (2) Except as otherwise provided in this division or division (B)(3), (4), (5), (6), (7), (8), or (9) of this section, a violation of this section is misdemeanor theft, a misdemeanor of the first degree. If the value of the property or services stolen is one thousand dollars or more and is less than seven thousand five hundred dollars or if the property stolen is any of the property listed in section 2913.71 of the Revised Code, a violation of this section is theft, a felony of the fifth degree. If the value of the property or services stolen is seven thousand five hundred dollars or more and is less than one hundred fifty thousand dollars, or if the offender has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a felony theft offense within the previous three years, a violation of this section is grand theft, a felony of the fourth degree. If the value of the property or services stolen is one hundred fifty thousand dollars or more and is less than seven hundred fifty thousand dollars, or if the offender two or more times has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a felony theft offense within the previous three years, a violation of this section is aggravated theft, a felony of the third degree. If the value of the property or services is seven hundred fifty thousand dollars or more and is less than one million five hundred thousand dollars, a violation of this section is aggravated theft, a felony of the second degree. If the value of the property or services stolen is one million five hundred thousand dollars or more, a violation of this section is aggravated theft of one million five hundred thousand dollars or more, a felony of the first degree. (3) Except as otherwise provided in division (B)(4), (5), (6), (7), (8), or (9) of this section, if the victim of the offense is an elderly person, disabled adultperson with a disability who the offender knows or reasonably should know has a disability, active duty service member, or spouse of an active duty service member, a violation of this section is theft from a person in a protected class, and division (B)(3) of this section applies. Except as otherwise provided in this division, theft from a person in a protected class is a felony of the fifth degree. If the value of the property or services stolen is one thousand dollars or more and is less than seven thousand five hundred dollars, or if the offender has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a felony theft offense within the previous three years, theft from a person in a protected class is a felony of the fourth degree. If the value of the property or services stolen is seven thousand five hundred dollars or more and is less than thirty-seven thousand five hundred dollars, or if the offender two or more times has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a felony theft offense within the previous three years, theft from a person in a protected class is a felony of the third degree. If the value of the property or services stolen is thirty-seven thousand five hundred dollars or more and is less than one hundred fifty thousand dollars, theft from a person in a protected class is a felony of the second degree. If the value of the property or services stolen is one hundred fifty thousand dollars or more, theft from a person in a protected class is a felony of the first degree. If the victim of the offense is an elderly person, in addition to any other penalty imposed for the offense, the offender shall be required to pay full restitution to the victim and to pay a fine of up to fifty thousand dollars. The clerk of court shall forward all fines collected under division (B)(3) of this section to the county department of job and family services to be used for the reporting and investigation of elder abuse, neglect, and exploitation or for the provision or arrangement of protective services under sections 5101.61 to 5101.71 of the Revised Code. (4) If the property stolen is a firearm or dangerous ordnance, a violation of this section is grand theft. Except as otherwise provided in this division, grand theft when the property stolen is a firearm or dangerous ordnance is a felony of the third degree, and there is a presumption in favor of the court imposing a prison term for the offense. If the firearm or dangerous ordnance was stolen from a federally licensed firearms dealer, grand theft when the property stolen is a firearm or dangerous ordnance is a felony of the first degree. The offender shall serve a prison term imposed for grand theft when the property stolen is a firearm or dangerous ordnance consecutively to any other prison term or mandatory prison term previously or subsequently imposed upon the offender. (5) If the property stolen is a motor vehicle, a violation of this section is grand theft of a motor vehicle, a felony of the fourth degree. (6) If the property stolen is any dangerous drug, a violation of this section is theft of drugs, a felony of the fourth degree, or, if the offender previously has been convicted of a felony drug abuse offense, a felony of the third degree. (7) If the property stolen is a police dog or horse or an assistance dog and the offender knows or should know that the property stolen is a police dog or horse or an assistance dog, a violation of this section is theft of a police dog or horse or an assistance dog, a felony of the third degree. (8) If the property stolen is anhydrous ammonia, a violation of this section is theft of anhydrous ammonia, a felony of the third degree. (9) Except as provided in division (B)(2) of this section with respect to property with a value of seven thousand five hundred dollars or more and division (B)(3) of this section with respect to property with a value of one thousand dollars or more, if the property stolen is a special purpose article as defined in section 4737.04 of the Revised Code or is a bulk merchandise container as defined in section 4737.012 of the Revised Code, a violation of this section is theft of a special purpose article or articles or theft of a bulk merchandise container or containers, a felony of the fifth degree. (10) In addition to the penalties described in division (B)(2) of this section, if the offender committed the violation by causing a motor vehicle to leave the premises of an establishment at which gasoline is offered for retail sale without the offender making full payment for gasoline that was dispensed into the fuel tank of the motor vehicle or into another container, the court may do one of the following: (a) Unless division (B)(10)(b) of this section applies, suspend for not more than six months the offender's driver's license, probationary driver's license, commercial driver's license, temporary instruction permit, or nonresident operating privilege; (b) If the offender's driver's license, probationary driver's license, commercial driver's license, temporary instruction permit, or nonresident operating privilege has previously been suspended pursuant to division (B)(10)(a) of this section, impose a class seven suspension of the offender's license, permit, or privilege from the range specified in division (A)(7) of section 4510.02 of the Revised Code, provided that the suspension shall be for at least six months.; (c) The court, in lieu of suspending the offender's driver's or commercial driver's license, probationary driver's license, temporary instruction permit, or nonresident operating privilege pursuant to division (B)(10)(a) or (b) of this section, instead may require the offender to perform community service for a number of hours determined by the court. (11) In addition to the penalties described in division (B)(2) of this section, if the offender committed the violation by stealing rented property or rental services, the court may order that the offender make restitution pursuant to section 2929.18 or 2929.28 of the Revised Code. Restitution may include, but is not limited to, the cost of repairing or replacing the stolen property, or the cost of repairing the stolen property and any loss of revenue resulting from deprivation of the property due to theft of rental services that is less than or equal to the actual value of the property at the time it was rented. Evidence of intent to commit theft of rented property or rental services shall be determined pursuant to the provisions of section 2913.72 of the Revised Code. (C) The sentencing court that suspends an offender's license, permit, or nonresident operating privilege under division (B)(10) of this section may grant the offender limited driving privileges during the period of the suspension in accordance with Chapter 4510. of the Revised Code. Sec. 2913.03. (A) No person shall knowingly use or operate an aircraft, motor vehicle, motorcycle, motorboat, or other motor-propelled vehicle without the consent of the owner or person authorized to give consent. (B) No person shall knowingly use or operate an aircraft, motor vehicle, motorboat, or other motor-propelled vehicle without the consent of the owner or person authorized to give consent, and either remove it from this state or keep possession of it for more than forty-eight hours. (C) The following are affirmative defenses to a charge under this section: (1) At the time of the alleged offense, the actor, though mistaken, reasonably believed that the actor was authorized to use or operate the property. (2) At the time of the alleged offense, the actor reasonably believed that the owner or person empowered to give consent would authorize the actor to use or operate the property. (D)(1) Whoever violates this section is guilty of unauthorized use of a vehicle. (2) Except as otherwise provided in division (D)(4) of this section, a violation of division (A) of this section is a misdemeanor of the first degree. (3) Except as otherwise provided in division (D)(4) of this section, a violation of division (B) of this section is a felony of the fifth degree. (4) If the victim of the offense is an elderly person or disabled adult a person with a disability and the offender knows or reasonably should know that the victim is a person with a disability and if the victim incurs a loss as a result of the violation, a violation of division (A) or (B) of this section is whichever of the following is applicable: (a) Except as otherwise provided in division (D)(4)(b), (c), or (d) of this section, a felony of the fifth degree; (b) If the loss to the victim is one thousand dollars or more and is less than seven thousand five hundred dollars, a felony of the fourth degree; (c) If the loss to the victim is seven thousand five hundred dollars or more and is less than thirty-seven thousand five hundred dollars, a felony of the third degree; (d) If the loss to the victim is thirty-seven thousand five hundred dollars or more, a felony of the second degree. Sec. 2913.04. (A) No person shall knowingly use or operate the property of another without the consent of the owner or person authorized to give consent. (B) No person, in any manner and by any means, including, but not limited to, computer hacking, shall knowingly gain access to, attempt to gain access to, or cause access to be gained to any computer, computer system, computer network, cable service, cable system, telecommunications device, telecommunications service, or information service without the consent of, or beyond the scope of the express or implied consent of, the owner of the computer, computer system, computer network, cable service, cable system, telecommunications device, telecommunications service, or information service or other person authorized to give consent. (C) Except as permitted under section 5503.101 of the Revised Code, no person shall knowingly gain access to, attempt to gain access to, cause access to be granted to, or disseminate information gained from access to the law enforcement automated database system created pursuant to section 5503.10 of the Revised Code without the consent of, or beyond the scope of the express or implied consent of, the chair of the law enforcement automated data system steering committee. (D) No person shall knowingly gain access to, attempt to gain access to, cause access to be granted to, or disseminate information gained from access to the Ohio law enforcement gateway established and operated pursuant to division (C)(1) of section 109.57 of the Revised Code without the consent of, or beyond the scope of the express or implied consent of, the superintendent of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation. (E) The affirmative defenses contained in division (C) of section 2913.03 of the Revised Code are affirmative defenses to a charge under this section. (F)(1) Whoever violates division (A) of this section is guilty of unauthorized use of property. (2) Except as otherwise provided in division (F)(3) or (4) of this section, unauthorized use of property is a misdemeanor of the fourth degree. (3) Except as otherwise provided in division (F)(4) of this section, if unauthorized use of property is committed for the purpose of devising or executing a scheme to defraud or to obtain property or services, unauthorized use of property is whichever of the following is applicable: (a) Except as otherwise provided in division (F)(3)(b), (c), or (d) of this section, a misdemeanor of the first degree. (b) If the value of the property or services or the loss to the victim is one thousand dollars or more and is less than seven thousand five hundred dollars, a felony of the fifth degree. (c) If the value of the property or services or the loss to the victim is seven thousand five hundred dollars or more and is less than one hundred fifty thousand dollars, a felony of the fourth degree. (d) If the value of the property or services or the loss to the victim is one hundred fifty thousand dollars or more, a felony of the third degree. (4) If the victim of the offense is an elderly person or disabled adulta person with a disability and the offender knows or reasonably should know that the victim is a person with a disability, unauthorized use of property is whichever of the following is applicable: (a) Except as otherwise provided in division (F)(4)(b), (c), or (d) of this section, a felony of the fifth degree; (b) If the value of the property or services or loss to the victim is one thousand dollars or more and is less than seven thousand five hundred dollars, a felony of the fourth degree; (c) If the value of the property or services or loss to the victim is seven thousand five hundred dollars or more and is less than thirty-seven thousand five hundred dollars, a felony of the third degree; (d) If the value of the property or services or loss to the victim is thirty-seven thousand five hundred dollars or more, a felony of the second degree. (G)(1) Whoever violates division (B) of this section is guilty of unauthorized use of computer, cable, or telecommunication property, and shall be punished as provided in division (G)(2), (3), or (4) of this section. (2) Except as otherwise provided in division (G)(3) or (4) of this section, unauthorized use of computer, cable, or telecommunication property is a felony of the fifth degree. (3) Except as otherwise provided in division (G)(4) of this section, if unauthorized use of computer, cable, or telecommunication property is committed for the purpose of devising or executing a scheme to defraud or to obtain property or services, for obtaining money, property, or services by false or fraudulent pretenses, or for committing any other criminal offense, unauthorized use of computer, cable, or telecommunication property is whichever of the following is applicable: (a) Except as otherwise provided in division (G)(3)(b) of this section, if the value of the property or services involved or the loss to the victim is seven thousand five hundred dollars or more and less than one hundred fifty thousand dollars, a felony of the fourth degree; (b) If the value of the property or services involved or the loss to the victim is one hundred fifty thousand dollars or more, a felony of the third degree. (4) If the victim of the offense is an elderly person or disabled adulta person with a disability and the offender knows or reasonably should know that the victim is a person with a disability, unauthorized use of computer, cable, or telecommunication property is whichever of the following is applicable: (a) Except as otherwise provided in division (G)(4)(b), (c), or (d) of this section, a felony of the fifth degree; (b) If the value of the property or services or loss to the victim is one thousand dollars or more and is less than seven thousand five hundred dollars, a felony of the fourth degree; (c) If the value of the property or services or loss to the victim is seven thousand five hundred dollars or more and is less than thirty-seven thousand five hundred dollars, a felony of the third degree; (d) If the value of the property or services or loss to the victim is thirty-seven thousand five hundred dollars or more, a felony of the second degree. (H) Whoever violates division (C) of this section is guilty of unauthorized use of the law enforcement automated database system, a felony of the fifth degree. (I) Whoever violates division (D) of this section is guilty of unauthorized use of the Ohio law enforcement gateway, a felony of the fifth degree. (J) As used in this section: (1) "Cable operator" means any person or group of persons that does either of the following: (a) Provides cable service over a cable system and directly or through one or more affiliates owns a significant interest in that cable system; (b) Otherwise controls or is responsible for, through any arrangement, the management and operation of a cable system. (2) "Cable service" means any of the following: (a) The one-way transmission to subscribers of video programming or of information that a cable operator makes available to all subscribers generally; (b) Subscriber interaction, if any, that is required for the selection or use of video programming or of information that a cable operator makes available to all subscribers generally, both as described in division (J)(2)(a) of this section; (c) Any cable television service. (3) "Cable system" means any facility, consisting of a set of closed transmission paths and associated signal generation, reception, and control equipment that is designed to provide cable service that includes video programming and that is provided to multiple subscribers within a community. "Cable system" does not include any of the following: (a) Any facility that serves only to retransmit the television signals of one or more television broadcast stations; (b) Any facility that serves subscribers without using any public right-of-way; (c) Any facility of a common carrier that, under 47 U.S.C.A. 522(7)(c), is excluded from the term "cable system" as defined in 47 U.S.C.A. 522(7); (d) Any open video system that complies with 47 U.S.C.A. 573; (e) Any facility of any electric utility used solely for operating its electric utility system. Sec. 2913.05. (A) No person, having devised a scheme to defraud, shall knowingly disseminate, transmit, or cause to be disseminated or transmitted by means of a wire, radio, satellite, telecommunication, telecommunications device, telecommunications service, or voice over internet protocol service any writing, data, sign, signal, picture, sound, or image with purpose to execute or otherwise further the scheme to defraud. (B) No person, with the intent to defraud, cause harm, or wrongfully obtain anything of value, shall knowingly cause, directly or indirectly, any caller identification service to transmit or display misleading or inaccurate caller identification information in connection with any telecommunication service or voice over internet protocol service. (C) Divisions (A) and (B) of this section do not apply to any of the following: (1) A person who uses a telephone number that is identified as "unknown" or "blocked" or who leaves a message and includes the person's true identity; (2) Any lawfully authorized investigative, protective, or intelligence activity of a law enforcement agency of the United States, a state, a county, or a political subdivision of a state; (3) Any activity engaged in pursuant to a court order that specifically authorizes the use of caller identification manipulation. (D) If an offender commits a violation of division (A) or (B) of this section and the violation occurs as part of a course of conduct involving other violations of division (A) or (B) of this section or violations of, attempts to violate, conspiracies to violate, or complicity in violations of section 2913.02, 2913.04, 2913.11, 2913.21, 2913.31, 2913.42, 2913.43, or 2921.13 of the Revised Code, the court, in determining the degree of the offense pursuant to division (E) of this section, may aggregate the value of the benefit obtained by the offender or of the detriment to the victim of the fraud in the violations involved in that course of conduct. The course of conduct may involve one victim or more than one victim. (E)(1) Whoever violates this section is guilty of telecommunications fraud. Except as otherwise provided in this division, telecommunications fraud is a felony of the fifth degree. If the value of the benefit obtained by the offender or of the detriment to the victim of the fraud is one thousand dollars or more but less than seven thousand five hundred dollars, telecommunications fraud is a felony of the fourth degree. If the value of the benefit obtained by the offender or of the detriment to the victim of the fraud is seven thousand five hundred dollars or more but less than one hundred fifty thousand dollars, telecommunications fraud is a felony of the third degree. If the value of the benefit obtained by the offender or of the detriment to the victims of the fraud is one hundred fifty thousand dollars or more but less than one million dollars, telecommunications fraud is a felony of the second degree. If the value of the benefit obtained by the offender or of the detriment to the victims of the fraud is one million dollars or more, telecommunications fraud is a felony of the first degree. (2) If the victim of a violation of this section is an elderly person, disabled adultperson with a disability who the offender knows or reasonably should know has a disability, active duty service member, or spouse of an active duty service member, telecommunications fraud is a felony of the fourth degree. (F) As used in this section, "voice over internet protocol service" has the same meaning as in section 4927.01 of the Revised Code. Sec. 2913.21. (A) No person shall do any of the following: (1) Practice deception for the purpose of procuring the issuance of a credit card, when a credit card is issued in actual reliance thereon; (2) Knowingly buy or sell a credit card from or to a person other than the issuer; (3) As an officer, employee, or appointee of a political subdivision or as a public servant as defined under section 2921.01 of the Revised Code, knowingly misuse a credit card account held by a political subdivision. (B) No person, with purpose to defraud, shall do any of the following: (1) Obtain control over a credit card as security for a debt; (2) Obtain property or services by the use of a credit card, in one or more transactions, knowing or having reasonable cause to believe that the card has expired or been revoked, or was obtained, is retained, or is being used in violation of law; (3) Furnish property or services upon presentation of a credit card, knowing that the card is being used in violation of law; (4) Represent or cause to be represented to the issuer of a credit card that property or services have been furnished, knowing that the representation is false. (C) No person, with purpose to violate this section, shall receive, possess, control, or dispose of a credit card. (D)(1) Whoever violates this section is guilty of misuse of credit cards. (2) Except as otherwise provided in division (D)(4) of this section, a violation of division (A), (B)(1), or (C) of this section is a misdemeanor of the first degree. (3) Except as otherwise provided in this division or division (D)(4) of this section, a violation of division (B)(2), (3), or (4) of this section is a misdemeanor of the first degree. If the cumulative retail value of the property and services involved in one or more violations of division (B)(2), (3), or (4) of this section, which violations involve one or more credit card accounts and occur within a period of ninety consecutive days commencing on the date of the first violation, is one thousand dollars or more and is less than seven thousand five hundred dollars, misuse of credit cards in violation of any of those divisions is a felony of the fifth degree. If the cumulative retail value of the property and services involved in one or more violations of division (B)(2), (3), or (4) of this section, which violations involve one or more credit card accounts and occur within a period of ninety consecutive days commencing on the date of the first violation, is seven thousand five hundred dollars or more and is less than one hundred fifty thousand dollars, misuse of credit cards in violation of any of those divisions is a felony of the fourth degree. If the cumulative retail value of the property and services involved in one or more violations of division (B)(2), (3), or (4) of this section, which violations involve one or more credit card accounts and occur within a period of ninety consecutive days commencing on the date of the first violation, is one hundred fifty thousand dollars or more, misuse of credit cards in violation of any of those divisions is a felony of the third degree. (4) If the victim of the offense is an elderly person or disabled adulta person with a disability and the offender knows or reasonably should know that the victim is a person with a disability, and if the offense involves a violation of division (B)(1) or (2) of this section, division (D)(4) of this section applies. Except as otherwise provided in division (D)(4) of this section, a violation of division (B)(1) or (2) of this section is a felony of the fifth degree. If the debt for which the card is held as security or the cumulative retail value of the property or services involved in the violation is one thousand dollars or more and is less than seven thousand five hundred dollars, a violation of either of those divisions is a felony of the fourth degree. If the debt for which the card is held as security or the cumulative retail value of the property or services involved in the violation is seven thousand five hundred dollars or more and is less than thirty-seven thousand five hundred dollars, a violation of either of those divisions is a felony of the third degree. If the debt for which the card is held as security or the cumulative retail value of the property or services involved in the violation is thirty-seven thousand five hundred dollars or more, a violation of either of those divisions is a felony of the second degree. In addition to any other penalty imposed under division (D)(4) of this section, the offender shall be required to pay full restitution to the victim and to pay a fine of up to fifty thousand dollars. The clerk of court shall forward all fines collected under division (D)(4) of this section to the county department of job and family services to be used for the reporting and investigation of elder abuse, neglect, and exploitation or for the provision or arrangement of protective services under sections 5101.61 to 5101.71 of the Revised Code. Sec. 2913.31. (A) No person, with purpose to defraud, or knowing that the person is facilitating a fraud, shall do any of the following: (1) Forge any writing of another without the other person's authority; (2) Forge any writing so that it purports to be genuine when it actually is spurious, or to be the act of another who did not authorize that act, or to have been executed at a time or place or with terms different from what in fact was the case, or to be a copy of an original when no such original existed; (3) Utter, or possess with purpose to utter, any writing that the person knows to have been forged. (B) No person shall knowingly do either of the following: (1) Forge an identification card; (2) Sell or otherwise distribute a card that purports to be an identification card, knowing it to have been forged. As used in this division, "identification card" means a card that includes personal information or characteristics of an individual, a purpose of which is to establish the identity of the bearer described on the card, whether the words "identity," "identification," "identification card," or other similar words appear on the card. (C)(1)(a) Whoever violates division (A) of this section is guilty of forgery. (b) Except as otherwise provided in this division or division (C)(1)(c) of this section and subject to division (C)(1)(d) of this section, forgery is a felony of the fifth degree. If property or services are involved in the offense or the victim suffers a loss, forgery is one of the following: (i) If the value of the property or services or the loss to the victim is seven thousand five hundred dollars or more and is less than one hundred fifty thousand dollars, a felony of the fourth degree; (ii) If the value of the property or services or the loss to the victim is one hundred fifty thousand dollars or more, a felony of the third degree. (c) If the victim of the offense is an elderly person or disabled adulta person with a disability and the offender knows or reasonably should know that the victim is a person with a disability, division (C)(1)(c) of this section applies to the forgery. Except as otherwise provided in division (C)(1)(c) of this section, forgery is a felony of the fifth degree. If property or services are involved in the offense or if the victim suffers a loss, forgery is one of the following: (i) If the value of the property or services or the loss to the victim is one thousand dollars or more and is less than seven thousand five hundred dollars, a felony of the fourth degree; (ii) If the value of the property or services or the loss to the victim is seven thousand five hundred dollars or more and is less than thirty-seven thousand five hundred dollars, a felony of the third degree; (iii) If the value of the property or services or the loss to the victim is thirty-seven thousand five hundred dollars or more, a felony of the second degree. (d) If the victim of the offense is an elderly person, division (C)(1)(d) of this section applies to the forgery. In addition to any other penalty imposed for the offense under division (C)(1)(c) of this section, the offender shall be required to pay full restitution to the victim and to pay a fine of up to fifty thousand dollars. The clerk of court shall forward all fines collected under division (C)(1)(d) of this section to the county department of job and family services to be used for the reporting and investigation of elder abuse, neglect, and exploitation or for the provision or arrangement of protective services under sections 5101.61 to 5101.71 of the Revised Code. (2)(a) Whoever violates division (B) of this section is guilty of forging identification cards or selling or distributing forged identification cards. Except as otherwise provided in this division, forging identification cards or selling or distributing forged identification cards is a misdemeanor of the first degree. If the offender previously has been convicted of a violation of division (B) of this section, forging identification cards or selling or distributing forged identification cards is a misdemeanor of the first degree and, in addition, the court shall impose upon the offender a fine of not less than two hundred fifty dollars. (b) If the victim of a violation of division (B) of this section is an elderly person, division (C)(2)(b) of this section applies to the offense. In addition to any other penalty imposed for the offense under division (C)(2)(a) of this section, whoever violates division (B) of this section shall be required to pay full restitution to the victim and to pay a fine of up to fifty thousand dollars. The clerk of court shall forward all fines collected under division (C)(2)(b) of this section to the county department of job and family services to be used for the reporting and investigation of elder abuse, neglect, and exploitation or for the provision or arrangement of protective services under sections 5101.61 to 5101.71 of the Revised Code. Sec. 2913.43. (A) No person, by deception, shall cause another to execute any writing that disposes of or encumbers property, or by which a pecuniary obligation is incurred. (B)(1) Whoever violates this section is guilty of securing writings by deception. (2) Except as otherwise provided in this division or division (B)(3) of this section, securing writings by deception is a misdemeanor of the first degree. If the value of the property or the obligation involved is one thousand dollars or more and less than seven thousand five hundred dollars, securing writings by deception is a felony of the fifth degree. If the value of the property or the obligation involved is seven thousand five hundred dollars or more and is less than one hundred fifty thousand dollars, securing writings by deception is a felony of the fourth degree. If the value of the property or the obligation involved is one hundred fifty thousand dollars or more, securing writings by deception is a felony of the third degree. (3) If the victim of the offense is an elderly person, disabled adultperson with a disability who the offender knows or reasonably should know has a disability, active duty service member, or spouse of an active duty service member, division (B)(3) of this section applies. Except as otherwise provided in division (B)(3) of this section, securing writings by deception is a felony of the fifth degree. If the value of the property or obligation involved is one thousand dollars or more and is less than seven thousand five hundred dollars, securing writings by deception is a felony of the fourth degree. If the value of the property or obligation involved is seven thousand five hundred dollars or more and is less than thirty-seven thousand five hundred dollars, securing writings by deception is a felony of the third degree. If the value of the property or obligation involved is thirty-seven thousand five hundred dollars or more, securing writings by deception is a felony of the second degree. If the victim of the offense is an elderly person, in addition to any other penalty imposed for the offense, the offender shall be required to pay full restitution to the victim and to pay a fine of up to fifty thousand dollars. The clerk of court shall forward all fines collected under division (B)(3) of this section to the county department of job and family services to be used for the reporting and investigation of elder abuse, neglect, and exploitation or for the provision or arrangement of protective services under sections 5101.61 to 5101.71 of the Revised Code. Sec. 2913.49. (A) As used in this section, "personal identifying information" includes, but is not limited to, the following: the name, address, telephone number, driver's license, driver's license number, commercial driver's license, commercial driver's license number, state identification card, state identification card number, social security card, social security number, birth certificate, place of employment, employee identification number, mother's maiden name, demand deposit account number, savings account number, money market account number, mutual fund account number, other financial account number, personal identification number, password, or credit card number of a living or dead individual. (B) No person, without the express or implied consent of the other person, shall use, obtain, or possess any personal identifying information of another person with intent to do either of the following: (1) Hold the person out to be the other person; (2) Represent the other person's personal identifying information as the person's own personal identifying information. (C) No person shall create, obtain, possess, or use the personal identifying information of any person with the intent to aid or abet another person in violating division (B) of this section. (D) No person, with intent to defraud, shall permit another person to use the person's own personal identifying information. (E) No person who is permitted to use another person's personal identifying information as described in division (D) of this section shall use, obtain, or possess the other person's personal identifying information with intent to defraud any person by doing any act identified in division (B)(1) or (2) of this section. (F)(1) It is an affirmative defense to a charge under division (B) of this section that the person using the personal identifying information is acting in accordance with a legally recognized guardianship or conservatorship or as a trustee or fiduciary. (2) It is an affirmative defense to a charge under division (B), (C), (D), or (E) of this section that either of the following applies: (a) The person or entity using, obtaining, possessing, or creating the personal identifying information or permitting it to be used is a law enforcement agency, authorized fraud personnel, or a representative of or attorney for a law enforcement agency or authorized fraud personnel and is using, obtaining, possessing, or creating the personal identifying information or permitting it to be used, with prior consent given as specified in this division, in a bona fide investigation, an information security evaluation, a pretext calling evaluation, or a similar matter. The prior consent required under this division shall be given by the person whose personal identifying information is being used, obtained, possessed, or created or is being permitted to be used or, if the person whose personal identifying information is being used, obtained, possessed, or created or is being permitted to be used is deceased, by that deceased person's executor, or a member of that deceased person's family, or that deceased person's attorney. The prior consent required under this division may be given orally or in writing by the person whose personal identifying information is being used, obtained, possessed, or created or is being permitted to be used or that person's executor, or family member, or attorney. (b) The personal identifying information was obtained, possessed, used, created, or permitted to be used for a lawful purpose, provided that division (F)(2)(b) of this section does not apply if the person or entity using, obtaining, possessing, or creating the personal identifying information or permitting it to be used is a law enforcement agency, authorized fraud personnel, or a representative of or attorney for a law enforcement agency or authorized fraud personnel that is using, obtaining, possessing, or creating the personal identifying information or permitting it to be used in an investigation, an information security evaluation, a pretext calling evaluation, or similar matter. (G) It is not a defense to a charge under this section that the person whose personal identifying information was obtained, possessed, used, created, or permitted to be used was deceased at the time of the offense. (H)(1) If an offender commits a violation of division (B), (D), or (E) of this section and the violation occurs as part of a course of conduct involving other violations of division (B), (D), or (E) of this section or violations of, attempts to violate, conspiracies to violate, or complicity in violations of division (C) of this section or section 2913.02, 2913.04, 2913.11, 2913.21, 2913.31, 2913.42, 2913.43, or 2921.13 of the Revised Code, the court, in determining the degree of the offense pursuant to division (I) of this section, may aggregate all credit, property, or services obtained or sought to be obtained by the offender and all debts or other legal obligations avoided or sought to be avoided by the offender in the violations involved in that course of conduct. The course of conduct may involve one victim or more than one victim. (2) If an offender commits a violation of division (C) of this section and the violation occurs as part of a course of conduct involving other violations of division (C) of this section or violations of, attempts to violate, conspiracies to violate, or complicity in violations of division (B), (D), or (E) of this section or section 2913.02, 2913.04, 2913.11, 2913.21, 2913.31, 2913.42, 2913.43, or 2921.13 of the Revised Code, the court, in determining the degree of the offense pursuant to division (I) of this section, may aggregate all credit, property, or services obtained or sought to be obtained by the person aided or abetted and all debts or other legal obligations avoided or sought to be avoided by the person aided or abetted in the violations involved in that course of conduct. The course of conduct may involve one victim or more than one victim. (I)(1) Whoever violates this section is guilty of identity fraud. (2) Except as otherwise provided in this division or division (I)(3) of this section, identity fraud is a felony of the fifth degree. If the value of the credit, property, services, debt, or other legal obligation involved in the violation or course of conduct is one thousand dollars or more and is less than seven thousand five hundred dollars, except as otherwise provided in division (I)(3) of this section, identity fraud is a felony of the fourth degree. If the value of the credit, property, services, debt, or other legal obligation involved in the violation or course of conduct is seven thousand five hundred dollars or more and is less than one hundred fifty thousand dollars, except as otherwise provided in division (I)(3) of this section, identity fraud is a felony of the third degree. If the value of the credit, property, services, debt, or other legal obligation involved in the violation or course of conduct is one hundred fifty thousand dollars or more, except as otherwise provided in division (I)(3) of this section, identity fraud is a felony of the second degree. (3) If the victim of the offense is an elderly person, disabled adultperson with a disability who the offender knows or reasonably should know has a disability, active duty service member, or spouse of an active duty service member, a violation of this section is identity fraud against a person in a protected class. Except as otherwise provided in this division, identity fraud against a person in a protected class is a felony of the fourth degree. If the value of the credit, property, services, debt, or other legal obligation involved in the violation or course of conduct is one thousand dollars or more and is less than seven thousand five hundred dollars, identity fraud against a person in a protected class is a felony of the third degree. If the value of the credit, property, services, debt, or other legal obligation involved in the violation or course of conduct is seven thousand five hundred dollars or more and is less than one hundred fifty thousand dollars, identity fraud against a person in a protected class is a felony of the second degree. If the value of the credit, property, services, debt, or other legal obligation involved in the violation or course of conduct is one hundred fifty thousand dollars or more, identity fraud against a person in a protected class is a felony of the first degree. If the victim of the offense is an elderly person, in addition to any other penalty imposed for the offense, the offender shall be required to pay full restitution to the victim and to pay a fine of up to fifty thousand dollars. The clerk of court shall forward all fines collected under division (I)(3) of this section to the county department of job and family services to be used for the reporting and investigation of elder abuse, neglect, and exploitation or for the provision or arrangement of protective services under sections 5101.61 to 5101.71 of the Revised Code. (J) In addition to the penalties described in division (I) of this section, anyone injured in person or property by a violation of division (B), (D), or (E) of this section who is the owner of the identifying information involved in that violation has a civil action against the offender pursuant to section 2307.60 of the Revised Code. That person may also bring a civil action to enjoin or restrain future acts that would constitute a violation of division (B), (D), or (E) of this section. Sec. 2913.61. (A) When a person is charged with a theft offense, or with a violation of division (A)(1) of section 1716.14 of the Revised Code involving a victim who is an elderly person or disabled adult a person with a disability and the offender knows or reasonably should know that the victim is a person with a disability that involves property or services valued at one thousand dollars or more, property or services valued at one thousand dollars or more and less than seven thousand five hundred dollars, property or services valued at one thousand five hundred dollars or more and less than seven thousand five hundred dollars, property or services valued at seven thousand five hundred dollars or more and less than thirty-seven thousand five hundred dollars, property or services valued at seven thousand five hundred dollars or more and less than one hundred fifty thousand dollars, property or services valued at thirty-seven thousand five hundred dollars or more and less than one hundred fifty thousand dollars, property or services valued at thirty-seven thousand five hundred dollars or more, property or services valued at one hundred fifty thousand dollars or more, property or services valued at one hundred fifty thousand dollars or more and less than seven hundred fifty thousand dollars, property or services valued at seven hundred fifty thousand dollars or more and less than one million five hundred thousand dollars, or property or services valued at one million five hundred thousand dollars or more, the jury or court trying the accused shall determine the value of the property or services as of the time of the offense and, if a guilty verdict is returned, shall return the finding of value as part of the verdict. In any case in which the jury or court determines that the value of the property or services at the time of the offense was one thousand dollars or more, it is unnecessary to find and return the exact value, and it is sufficient if the finding and return is to the effect that the value of the property or services involved was one thousand dollars or more, was one thousand dollars or more and less than seven thousand five hundred dollars, was one thousand five hundred dollars or more and less than seven thousand five hundred dollars, was seven thousand five hundred dollars or more and less than thirty-seven thousand five hundred dollars, was seven thousand five hundred dollars or more and less than one hundred fifty thousand dollars, was thirty-seven thousand five hundred dollars or more and less than one hundred fifty thousand dollars, was thirty-seven thousand five hundred dollars or more, was one hundred fifty thousand dollars or more, was one hundred fifty thousand dollars or more and less than seven hundred fifty thousand dollars, was seven hundred fifty thousand dollars or more and less than one million five hundred thousand dollars, or was one million five hundred thousand dollars or more, whichever is relevant regarding the offense. (B) If more than one item of property or services is involved in a theft offense or in a violation of division (A)(1) of section 1716.14 of the Revised Code involving a victim who is an elderly person or disabled adulta person with a disability and the offender knows or reasonably should know that the victim is a person with a disability, the value of the property or services involved for the purpose of determining the value as required by division (A) of this section is the aggregate value of all property or services involved in the offense. (C)(1) When a series of offenses under section 2913.02 of the Revised Code, or a series of violations of, attempts to commit a violation of, conspiracies to violate, or complicity in violations of division (A)(1) of section 1716.14, section 2913.02, 2913.03, or 2913.04, division (B)(1) or (2) of section 2913.21, or section 2913.31 or 2913.43 of the Revised Code involving a victim who is an elderly person or disabled adulta person with a disability and the offender knows or reasonably should know that the victim is a person with a disability, is committed by the offender in the offender's same employment, capacity, or relationship to another, all of those offenses shall be tried as a single offense. When a series of offenses under section 2913.02 of the Revised Code, or a series of violations of, attempts to commit a violation of, conspiracies to violate, or complicity in violations of section 2913.02 or 2913.43 of the Revised Code involving a victim who is an active duty service member or spouse of an active duty service member is committed by the offender in the offender's same employment, capacity, or relationship to another, all of those offenses shall be tried as a single offense. The value of the property or services involved in the series of offenses for the purpose of determining the value as required by division (A) of this section is the aggregate value of all property and services involved in all offenses in the series. (2) If an offender commits a series of offenses under section 2913.02 of the Revised Code that involves a common course of conduct to defraud multiple victims, all of the offenses may be tried as a single offense. If an offender is being tried for the commission of a series of violations of, attempts to commit a violation of, conspiracies to violate, or complicity in violations of division (A)(1) of section 1716.14, section 2913.02, 2913.03, or 2913.04, division (B)(1) or (2) of section 2913.21, or section 2913.31 or 2913.43 of the Revised Code, whether committed against one victim or more than one victim, involving a victim who is an elderly person or disabled adulta person with a disability and the offender knows or reasonably should know that the victim is a person with a disability, pursuant to a scheme or course of conduct, all of those offenses may be tried as a single offense. If an offender is being tried for the commission of a series of violations of, attempts to commit a violation of, conspiracies to violate, or complicity in violations of section 2913.02 or 2913.43 of the Revised Code, whether committed against one victim or more than one victim, involving a victim who is an active duty service member or spouse of an active duty service member pursuant to a scheme or course of conduct, all of those offenses may be tried as a single offense. If the offenses are tried as a single offense, the value of the property or services involved for the purpose of determining the value as required by division (A) of this section is the aggregate value of all property and services involved in all of the offenses in the course of conduct. (3) When a series of two or more offenses under section 2913.40, 2913.48, or 2921.41 of the Revised Code is committed by the offender in the offender's same employment, capacity, or relationship to another, all of those offenses may be tried as a single offense. If the offenses are tried as a single offense, the value of the property or services involved for the purpose of determining the value as required by division (A) of this section is the aggregate value of all property and services involved in all of the offenses in the series of two or more offenses. (4) In prosecuting a single offense under division (C)(1), (2), or (3) of this section, it is not necessary to separately allege and prove each offense in the series. Rather, it is sufficient to allege and prove that the offender, within a given span of time, committed one or more theft offenses or violations of section 2913.40, 2913.48, or 2921.41 of the Revised Code in the offender's same employment, capacity, or relationship to another as described in division (C)(1) or (3) of this section, or committed one or more theft offenses that involve a common course of conduct to defraud multiple victims or a scheme or course of conduct as described in division (C)(2) of this section. While it is not necessary to separately allege and prove each offense in the series in order to prosecute a single offense under division (C)(1), (2), or (3) of this section, it remains necessary in prosecuting them as a single offense to prove the aggregate value of the property or services in order to meet the requisite statutory offense level sought by the prosecution. (D) The following criteria shall be used in determining the value of property or services involved in a theft offense: (1) The value of an heirloom, memento, collector's item, antique, museum piece, manuscript, document, record, or other thing that has intrinsic worth to its owner and that either is irreplaceable or is replaceable only on the expenditure of substantial time, effort, or money, is the amount that would compensate the owner for its loss. (2) The value of personal effects and household goods, and of materials, supplies, equipment, and fixtures used in the profession, business, trade, occupation, or avocation of its owner, which property is not covered under division (D)(1) of this section and which retains substantial utility for its purpose regardless of its age or condition, is the cost of replacing the property with new property of like kind and quality. (3) The value of any real or personal property that is not covered under division (D)(1) or (2) of this section, and the value of services, is the fair market value of the property or services. As used in this section, "fair market value" is the money consideration that a buyer would give and a seller would accept for property or services, assuming that the buyer is willing to buy and the seller is willing to sell, that both are fully informed as to all facts material to the transaction, and that neither is under any compulsion to act. (E) Without limitation on the evidence that may be used to establish the value of property or services involved in a theft offense: (1) When the property involved is personal property held for sale at wholesale or retail, the price at which the property was held for sale is prima-facie evidence of its value. (2) When the property involved is a security or commodity traded on an exchange, the closing price or, if there is no closing price, the asked price, given in the latest market quotation prior to the offense is prima-facie evidence of the value of the security or commodity. (3) When the property involved is livestock, poultry, or raw agricultural products for which a local market price is available, the latest local market price prior to the offense is prima-facie evidence of the value of the livestock, poultry, or products. (4) When the property involved is a negotiable instrument, the face value is prima-facie evidence of the value of the instrument. (5) When the property involved is a warehouse receipt, bill of lading, pawn ticket, claim check, or other instrument entitling the holder or bearer to receive property, the face value or, if there is no face value, the value of the property covered by the instrument less any payment necessary to receive the property is prima-facie evidence of the value of the instrument. (6) When the property involved is a ticket of admission, ticket for transportation, coupon, token, or other instrument entitling the holder or bearer to receive property or services, the face value or, if there is no face value, the value of the property or services that may be received by the instrument is prima-facie evidence of the value of the instrument. (7) When the services involved are gas, electricity, water, telephone, transportation, shipping, or other services for which the rate is established by law, the duly established rate is prima-facie evidence of the value of the services. (8) When the services involved are services for which the rate is not established by law, and the offender has been notified prior to the offense of the rate for the services, either in writing, orally, or by posting in a manner reasonably calculated to come to the attention of potential offenders, the rate contained in the notice is prima-facie evidence of the value of the services. Sec. 2917.21. (A) No person shall knowingly make or cause to be made a telecommunication, or knowingly permit a telecommunication to be made from a telecommunications device under the person's control, to another, if the caller does any of the following: (1) Makes the telecommunication with purpose to harass, intimidate, or abuse any person at the premises to which the telecommunication is made, whether or not actual communication takes place between the caller and a recipient; (2) Describes, suggests, requests, or proposes that the caller, the recipient of the telecommunication, or any other person engage in sexual activity, and the recipient or another person at the premises to which the telecommunication is made has requested, in a previous telecommunication or in the immediate telecommunication, that the caller not make a telecommunication to the recipient or to the premises to which the telecommunication is made; (3) During the telecommunication, violates section 2903.21 of the Revised Code; (4) Knowingly states to the recipient of the telecommunication that the caller intends to cause damage to or destroy public or private property, and the recipient, any member of the recipient's family, or any other person who resides at the premises to which the telecommunication is made owns, leases, resides, or works in, will at the time of the destruction or damaging be near or in, has the responsibility of protecting, or insures the property that will be destroyed or damaged; (5) Knowingly makes the telecommunication to the recipient of the telecommunication, to another person at the premises to which the telecommunication is made, or to those premises, and the recipient or another person at those premises previously has told the caller not to make a telecommunication to those premises or to any persons at those premises; (6) Knowingly makes any comment, request, suggestion, or proposal to the recipient of the telecommunication that is threatening, intimidating, menacing, coercive, or obscene with the intent to abuse, threaten, or harass the recipient; (7) Without a lawful business purpose, knowingly interrupts the telecommunication service of any person; (8) Without a lawful business purpose, knowingly transmits to any person, regardless of whether the telecommunication is heard in its entirety, any file, document, or other communication that prevents that person from using the person's telephone service or electronic communication device; (9) Knowingly makes any false statement concerning the death, injury, illness, disfigurement, reputation, indecent conduct, or criminal conduct of the recipient of the telecommunication or family or household member of the recipient with purpose to abuse, threaten, intimidate, or harass the recipient; (10) Knowingly incites another person through a telecommunication or other means to harass or participate in the harassment of a person; (11) Knowingly alarms the recipient by making a telecommunication without a lawful purpose at an hour or hours known to be inconvenient to the recipient and in an offensive or repetitive manner. (B)(1) No person shall make or cause to be made a telecommunication, or permit a telecommunication to be made from a telecommunications device under the person's control, with purpose to abuse, threaten, or harass another person. (2) No person shall knowingly post a text or audio statement or an image on an internet web site or web page for the purpose of abusing, threatening, or harassing another person. (C)(1) Whoever violates this section is guilty of telecommunications harassment. (2) AExcept as otherwise provided in this division, a violation of division (A)(1), (2), (3), (5), (6), (7), (8), (9), (10), or (11) or (B) of this section is a misdemeanor of the first degree on a first offense and a felony of the fifth degree on each subsequent offense. If the victim is a person with a disability and the offender knows or reasonably should know that the victim is a person with a disability, a violation of division (A)(1), (2), (3), (5), (6), (7), (8), (9), (10), or (11) or division (B) of this section is a felony of the fifth degree on a first offense and a felony of the fourth degree on each subsequent offense. (3) Except as otherwise provided in this division (C)(3) of this section, a violation of division (A)(4) of this section is a misdemeanor of the first degree on a first offense and a felony of the fifth degree on each subsequent offense. If the victim is a person with a disability and the offender knows or reasonably should know that the victim is a person with a disability, a violation of division (A)(4) of this section is a felony of the fifth degree on a first offense and a felony of the fourth degree on each subsequent offense. If a violation of division (A)(4) of this section results in economic harm of one thousand dollars or more but less than seven thousand five hundred dollars, telecommunications harassment is a felony of the fifth degree. If the victim is a person with a disability and the offender knows or reasonably should know that the victim is a person with a disability, and a violation of division (A)(4) of this section results in economic harm of one thousand dollars or more but less than seven thousand five hundred dollars, telecommunications harassment is a felony of the fourth degree. If a violation of division (A)(4) of this section results in economic harm of seven thousand five hundred dollars or more but less than one hundred fifty thousand dollars, telecommunications harassment is a felony of the fourth degree. If the victim is a person with a disability and the offender knows or reasonably should know that the victim is a person with a disability, and a violation of division (A)(4) of this section results in economic harm of seven thousand five hundred dollars or more but less than one hundred fifty thousand dollars, telecommunications harassment is a felony of the third degree. If a violation of division (A)(4) of this section results in economic harm of one hundred fifty thousand dollars or more, telecommunications harassment is a felony of the third degree. If the victim is a person with a disability and the offender knows or reasonably should know that the victim is a person with a disability, and a violation of division (A)(4) of this section results in economic harm of one hundred fifty thousand dollars or more, telecommunications harassment is a felony of the second degree. (D) No cause of action may be asserted in any court of this state against any provider of a telecommunications service, interactive computer service as defined in section 230 of Title 47 of the United States Code, or information service, or against any officer, employee, or agent of a telecommunication service, interactive computer service as defined in section 230 of Title 47 of the United States Code, or information service, for any injury, death, or loss to person or property that allegedly arises out of the provider's, officer's, employee's, or agent's provision of information, facilities, or assistance in accordance with the terms of a court order that is issued in relation to the investigation or prosecution of an alleged violation of this section. A provider of a telecommunications service, interactive computer service as defined in section 230 of Title 47 of the United States Code, or information service, or an officer, employee, or agent of a telecommunications service, interactive computer service as defined in section 230 of Title 47 of the United States Code, or information service, is immune from any civil or criminal liability for injury, death, or loss to person or property that allegedly arises out of the provider's, officer's, employee's, or agent's provision of information, facilities, or assistance in accordance with the terms of a court order that is issued in relation to the investigation or prosecution of an alleged violation of this section. (E)(1) This section does not apply to a person solely because the person provided access or connection to or from an electronic method of remotely transferring information not under that person's control, including having provided capabilities that are incidental to providing access or connection to or from the electronic method of remotely transferring the information, and that do not include the creation of the content of the material that is the subject of the access or connection. In addition, any person providing access or connection to or from an electronic method of remotely transferring information not under that person's control shall not be liable for any action voluntarily taken in good faith to block the receipt or transmission through its service of any information that the person believes is, or will be sent, in violation of this section. (2) Division (E)(1) of this section does not create an affirmative duty for any person providing access or connection to or from an electronic method of remotely transferring information not under that person's control to block the receipt or transmission through its service of any information that it believes is, or will be sent, in violation of this section except as otherwise provided by law. (3) Division (E)(1) of this section does not apply to a person who conspires with a person actively involved in the creation or knowing distribution of material in violation of this section or who knowingly advertises the availability of material of that nature. (4) A provider or user of an interactive computer service, as defined in section 230 of Title 47 of the United States Code, shall neither be treated as the publisher or speaker of any information provided by another information content provider, as defined in section 230 of Title 47 of the United States Code, nor held civilly or criminally liable for the creation or development of information provided by another information content provider, as defined in section 230 of Title 47 of the United States Code. Nothing in this division shall be construed to protect a person from liability to the extent that the person developed or created any content in violation of this section. (F) Divisions (A)(5) to (11) and (B)(2) of this section do not apply to a person who, while employed or contracted by a newspaper, magazine, press association, news agency, news wire service, cable channel or cable operator, or radio or television station, is gathering, processing, transmitting, compiling, editing, or disseminating information for the general public within the scope of the person's employment in that capacity or the person's contractual authority in that capacity. (G) As used in this section: (1) "Economic harm" means all direct, incidental, and consequential pecuniary harm suffered by a victim as a result of criminal conduct. "Economic harm" includes, but is not limited to, all of the following: (a) All wages, salaries, or other compensation lost as a result of the criminal conduct; (b) The cost of all wages, salaries, or other compensation paid to employees for time those employees are prevented from working as a result of the criminal conduct; (c) The overhead costs incurred for the time that a business is shut down as a result of the criminal conduct; (d) The loss of value to tangible or intangible property that was damaged as a result of the criminal conduct. (2) "Caller" means the person described in division (A) of this section who makes or causes to be made a telecommunication or who permits a telecommunication to be made from a telecommunications device under that person's control. (3) "Telecommunication" and "telecommunications device" have the same meanings as in section 2913.01 of the Revised Code. (4) "Sexual activity" has the same meaning as in section 2907.01 of the Revised Code. (5) "Family or household member" means any of the following: (a) Any of the following who is residing or has resided with the recipient of the telecommunication against whom the act prohibited in division (A)(9) of this section is committed: (i) A spouse, a person living as a spouse, or a former spouse of the recipient; (ii) A parent, a foster parent, or a child of the recipient, or another person related by consanguinity or affinity to the recipient; (iii) A parent or a child of a spouse, person living as a spouse, or former spouse of the recipient, or another person related by consanguinity or affinity to a spouse, person living as a spouse, or former spouse of the recipient. (b) The natural parent of any child of whom the recipient of the telecommunication against whom the act prohibited in division (A)(9) of this section is committed is the other natural parent or is the putative other natural parent. (6) "Person living as a spouse" means a person who is living or has lived with the recipient of the telecommunication against whom the act prohibited in division (A)(9) of this section is committed in a common law marital relationship, who otherwise is cohabiting with the recipient, or who otherwise has cohabited with the recipient within five years prior to the date of the alleged commission of the act in question. (7) "Cable operator" has the same meaning as in section 1332.21 of the Revised Code. (8) "Disability" has the same meaning as in section 4112.01 of the Revised Code. (H) Nothing in this section prohibits a person from making a telecommunication to a debtor that is in compliance with the "Fair Debt Collection Practices Act," 91 Stat. 874 (1977), 15 U.S.C. 1692, as amended, or the "Telephone Consumer Protection Act," 105 Stat. 2395 (1991), 47 U.S.C. 227, as amended. Sec. 2919.25. (A) No person shall knowingly cause or attempt to cause physical harm to a family or household member. (B) No person shall recklessly cause serious physical harm to a family or household member. (C) No person, by threat of force, shall knowingly cause a family or household member to believe that the offender will cause imminent physical harm to the family or household member. (D)(1) Whoever violates this section is guilty of domestic violence, and the court shall sentence the offender as provided in divisions (D)(2) to (6) of this section. (2) Except as otherwise provided in this division or divisions (D)(3) to (5) of this section, a violation of division (C) of this section is a misdemeanor of the fourth degree, and a violation of division (A) or (B) of this section is a misdemeanor of the first degree. If the victim is a person with a disability and the offender knows or reasonably should know that the victim is a person with a disability, a violation of division (C) of this section is a misdemeanor of the third degree and a violation of division (A) or (B) of this section is a felony of the fifth degree. (3) Except as otherwise provided in division (D)(4) of this section, if the offender previously has pleaded guilty to or been convicted of domestic violence, a violation of an existing or former municipal ordinance or law of this or any other state or the United States that is substantially similar to domestic violence, a violation of section 2903.14, 2909.06, 2909.07, 2911.12, 2911.211, or 2919.22 of the Revised Code if the victim of the violation was a family or household member at the time of the violation, a violation of an existing or former municipal ordinance or law of this or any other state or the United States that is substantially similar to any of those sections if the victim of the violation was a family or household member at the time of the commission of the violation, or any offense of violence if the victim of the offense was a family or household member at the time of the commission of the offense, a violation of division (A) or (B) of this section is a felony of the fourth degree, and, if the offender knew that the victim of the violation was pregnant at the time of the violation, the court shall impose a mandatory prison term on the offender pursuant to division (D)(6) of this section, and a violation of division (C) of this section is a misdemeanor of the second degree. (4) If the offender previously has pleaded guilty to or been convicted of two or more offenses of domestic violence or two or more violations or offenses of the type described in division (D)(3) of this section involving a person who was a family or household member at the time of the violations or offenses, a violation of division (A) or (B) of this section is a felony of the third degree, and there is a presumption for a prison term for the offense, and a violation of division (C) of this section is a misdemeanor of the first degree. If the offender previously has pleaded guilty to or been convicted of two or more offenses of domestic violence or two or more violations or offenses of the type described in division (D)(3) of this section involving a person who was a family or household member at the time of the violations or offenses, and the offender knew that the victim of the violation was pregnant at the time of the violation, a violation of division (A) or (B) of this section is a felony of the third degree, and the court shall impose a mandatory prison term on the offender pursuant to division (D)(6) of this section. (5) Except as otherwise provided in division (D)(3) or (4) of this section, if the offender knew that the victim of the violation was pregnant at the time of the violation, a violation of division (A) or (B) of this section is a felony of the fifth degree, and the court shall impose a mandatory prison term on the offender pursuant to division (D)(6) of this section, and a violation of division (C) of this section is a misdemeanor of the third degree. (6) If division (D)(3), (4), or (5) of this section requires the court that sentences an offender for a violation of division (A) or (B) of this section to impose a mandatory prison term on the offender pursuant to this division, the court shall impose the mandatory prison term as follows: (a) If the violation of division (A) or (B) of this section is a felony of the fourth or fifth degree, except as otherwise provided in division (D)(6)(b) or (c) of this section, the court shall impose a mandatory prison term on the offender of at least six months. (b) If the violation of division (A) or (B) of this section is a felony of the fifth degree and the offender, in committing the violation, caused serious physical harm to the pregnant woman's unborn or caused the termination of the pregnant woman's pregnancy, the court shall impose a mandatory prison term on the offender of twelve months. (c) If the violation of division (A) or (B) of this section is a felony of the fourth degree and the offender, in committing the violation, caused serious physical harm to the pregnant woman's unborn or caused the termination of the pregnant woman's pregnancy, the court shall impose a mandatory prison term on the offender of at least twelve months. (d) If the violation of division (A) or (B) of this section is a felony of the third degree and the offender knew that the victim of the violation was pregnant at the time of the violation, except as otherwise provided in division (D)(6)(e) of this section and notwithstanding the range of definite prison terms prescribed in division (A)(3) of section 2929.14 of the Revised Code for a felony of the third degree, the court shall impose a mandatory prison term on the offender of either a definite term of twelve months or one of the prison terms prescribed in division (A)(3)(a) of section 2929.14 of the Revised Code for felonies of the third degree. (e) If the violation of division (A) or (B) of this section is a felony of the third degree and the offender, in committing the violation, caused serious physical harm to the pregnant woman's unborn or caused the termination of the pregnant woman's pregnancy, notwithstanding the range of definite prison terms prescribed in division (A)(3) of section 2929.14 of the Revised Code for a felony of the third degree, the court shall impose a mandatory prison term on the offender of either a definite term of eighteen months or one of the prison terms prescribed in division (A)(3)(a) of section 2929.14 of the Revised Code for felonies of the third degree. (E) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, no court or unit of state or local government shall charge any fee, cost, deposit, or money in connection with the filing of charges against a person alleging that the person violated this section or a municipal ordinance substantially similar to this section or in connection with the prosecution of any charges so filed. (F) As used in this section and sections 2919.251 and 2919.26 of the Revised Code: (1) "Family or household member" means any of the following: (a) Any of the following who is residing or has resided with the offender: (i) A spouse, a person living as a spouse, or a former spouse of the offender; (ii) A parent, a foster parent, or a child of the offender, or another person related by consanguinity or affinity to the offender; (iii) A parent or a child of a spouse, person living as a spouse, or former spouse of the offender, or another person related by consanguinity or affinity to a spouse, person living as a spouse, or former spouse of the offender. (b) The natural parent of any child of whom the offender is the other natural parent or is the putative other natural parent. (2) "Person living as a spouse" means a person who is living or has lived with the offender in a common law marital relationship, who otherwise is cohabiting with the offender, or who otherwise has cohabited with the offender within five years prior to the date of the alleged commission of the act in question. (3) "Pregnant woman's unborn" has the same meaning as "such other person's unborn," as set forth in section 2903.09 of the Revised Code, as it relates to the pregnant woman. Division (C) of that section applies regarding the use of the term in this section, except that the second and third sentences of division (C)(1) of that section shall be construed for purposes of this section as if they included a reference to this section in the listing of Revised Code sections they contain. (4) "Termination of the pregnant woman's pregnancy" has the same meaning as "unlawful termination of another's pregnancy," as set forth in section 2903.09 of the Revised Code, as it relates to the pregnant woman. Division (C) of that section applies regarding the use of the term in this section, except that the second and third sentences of division (C)(1) of that section shall be construed for purposes of this section as if they included a reference to this section in the listing of Revised Code sections they contain. (5) "Disability" has the same meaning as in section 4112.01 of the Revised Code. Section 2. That existing sections 2903.10, 2903.11, 2903.12, 2903.13, 2903.14, 2903.16, 2903.18, 2903.21, 2903.211, 2903.22, 2903.31, 2905.01, 2905.11, 2905.12, 2905.22, 2905.32, 2907.03, 2907.05, 2909.01, 2909.06, 2909.07, 2911.02, 2911.12, 2913.01, 2913.02, 2913.03, 2913.04, 2913.05, 2913.21, 2913.31, 2913.43, 2913.49, 2913.61, 2917.21, and 2919.25 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed. Section 3. The General Assembly, applying the principle stated in division (B) of section 1.52 of the Revised Code that amendments are to be harmonized if reasonably capable of simultaneous operation, finds that the following sections, presented in this act as composites of the sections as amended by the acts indicated, are the resulting versions of the sections in effect prior to the effective date of the sections as presented in this act: Section 2903.11 of the Revised Code as amended by both S.B. 20 and S.B. 201 of the 132nd General Assembly. Section 2907.03 of the Revised Code as amended by H.B. 33, H.B. 161, and S.B. 109, all of the 135th General Assembly. Section 2913.21 of the Revised Code as amended by both H.B. 312 and S.B. 158 of the 132nd General Assembly.